Illinois, session 104th, SB1377.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The University of Illinois Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 305/7)  (from Ch. 144, par. 28)7    Sec. 7. Powers of trustees. 8    (a) The trustees shall have power to provide for the 9requisite buildings, apparatus, and conveniences; to fix the 10rates for tuition; to appoint such professors and instructors, 11and to establish and provide for the management of such model 12farms, model art, and other departments and professorships, as 13may be required to teach, in the most thorough manner, such 14branches of learning as are related to agriculture and the 15mechanic arts, and military tactics, without excluding other 16scientific and classical studies. The trustees shall, upon the 17written request of an employee withhold from the compensation 18of that employee any dues, payments or contributions payable 19by such employee to any labor organization as defined in the 20Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. Under such 21arrangement, an amount shall be withheld from each regular 22payroll period which is equal to the pro rata share of the 23annual dues plus any payments or contributions, and the   SB1377- 2 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1trustees shall transmit such withholdings to the specified 2labor organization within 10 working days from the time of the 3withholding. They may accept the endowments and voluntary 4professorships or departments in the University, from any 5person or persons or corporations who may offer the same, and, 6at any regular meeting of the board, may prescribe rules and 7regulations in relation to such endowments and declare on what 8general principles they may be admitted: Provided, that such 9special voluntary endowments or professorships shall not be 10incompatible with the true design and scope of the act of 11congress, or of this Act: Provided, that no student shall at 12any time be allowed to remain in or about the University in 13idleness, or without full mental or industrial occupation: And 14provided further, that the trustees, in the exercise of any of 15the powers conferred by this Act, shall not create any 16liability or indebtedness in excess of the funds in the hands 17of the treasurer of the University at the time of creating such 18liability or indebtedness, and which may be specially and 19properly applied to the payment of the same. Except as 20otherwise provided in this Section, any lease to the trustees 21of lands, buildings or facilities which will support 22scientific research and development in such areas as high 23technology, super computing, microelectronics, biotechnology, 24robotics, physics and engineering shall be for a term not to 25exceed 18 years, and may grant to the trustees the option to 26purchase the lands, buildings or facilities. The lease shall   SB1377- 3 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1recite that it is subject to termination and cancellation in 2any year for which the General Assembly fails to make an 3appropriation to pay the rent payable under the terms of the 4lease.5    Leases for the purposes described herein exceeding 5 years 6shall have the approval of the Illinois Board of Higher 7Education.8    The Board of Trustees may, directly or in cooperation with 9other institutions of higher education, acquire by purchase or 10lease or otherwise, and construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 11complete, operate, control and manage medical research and 12high technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 13buildings, facilities, equipment and personal property 14therefor, to encourage and facilitate (a) the location and 15development of business and industry in the State of Illinois, 16and (b) the increased application and development of 17technology and (c) the improvement and development of the 18State's economy. The Board of Trustees may lease to nonprofit 19corporations all or any part of the land, buildings, 20facilities, equipment or other property included in a medical 21research and high technology park upon such terms and 22conditions as the University of Illinois may deem advisable 23and enter into any contract or agreement with such nonprofit 24corporations as may be necessary or suitable for the 25construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 26management of any such park; and may lease to any person, firm,   SB1377- 4 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1partnership or corporation, either public or private, any part 2or all of the land, building, facilities, equipment or other 3property of such park for such purposes and upon such rentals, 4terms and conditions as the University may deem advisable; and 5may finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including 6the purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, 7improvement, remodeling, addition to, and extension and 8maintenance of all or part of such high technology park, and 9all equipment and furnishings, by legislative appropriations, 10government grants, contracts, private gifts, loans, receipts 11from the operation of such high technology park, rentals and 12similar receipts; and may make its other facilities and 13services available to tenants or other occupants of any such 14park at rates which are reasonable and appropriate.15    The Board of Trustees may, directly or in cooperation with 16other members and partners of the collaborative research and 17academic initiative known as the Chicago Quantum Exchange, 18including, without limitation, other institutions of higher 19education, hereinafter each individually referred to as a "CQE 20partner", finance, design, construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 21complete, operate, control, and manage a facility or 22facilities for the research and development of quantum 23information sciences and technologies, hereinafter referred to 24as the "quantum science facilities". Notwithstanding any other 25provision of applicable law: (1) the quantum science 26facilities may be located on land owned by the Board of   SB1377- 5 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1Trustees or a CQE partner; and (2) costs incurred in 2connection with the design, construction, enlargement, 3improvement, equipping, and completion of the quantum science 4facilities may be paid with funds appropriated to the Capital 5Development Board from the Build Illinois Bond Fund for a 6grant to the Board of Trustees for the quantum science 7facilities, whether the quantum science facilities are located 8on land owned by the Board of Trustees or by a CQE partner; 9provided, however, that if any quantum science facilities are 10located on land owned by a CQE partner, the use of such grant 11funds shall be subject to, and contingent upon, the lease by 12the Board of Trustees, as lessee, of a portion of such quantum 13science facilities for a term equal to at least the useful life 14of such quantum science facilities. The leased premises under 15any such lease shall bear a reasonable relationship to the 16proportional share of the costs paid by such grant funds. Any 17such lease shall give the Board of Trustees the right to 18terminate the lease before the expiration of its term if the 19General Assembly fails to appropriate sufficient funds to pay 20rent due under the lease. 21    The Trustees shall have power (a) to purchase real 22property and easements, and (b) to acquire real property and 23easements in the manner provided by law for the exercise of the 24right of eminent domain, and in the event negotiations for the 25acquisition of real property or easements for making any 26improvement which the Trustees are authorized to make shall   SB1377- 6 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1have proven unsuccessful and the Trustees shall have by 2resolution adopted a schedule or plan of operation for the 3execution of the project and therein made a finding that it is 4necessary to take such property or easements immediately or at 5some specified later date in order to comply with the 6schedule, the Trustees may acquire such property or easements 7in the same manner provided in Article 20 of the Eminent Domain 8Act (quick-take procedure).9    The Board of Trustees also shall have power to agree with 10the State's Attorney of the county in which any properties of 11the Board are located to pay for services rendered by the 12various taxing districts for the years 1944 through 1949 and 13to pay annually for services rendered thereafter by such 14district such sums as may be determined by the Board upon 15properties used solely for income producing purposes, title to 16which is held by said Board of Trustees, upon properties 17leased to members of the staff of the University of Illinois, 18title to which is held in trust for said Board of Trustees and 19upon properties leased to for-profit entities the title to 20which properties is held by the Board of Trustees. A certified 21copy of any such agreement made with the State's Attorney 22shall be filed with the County Clerk and such sums shall be 23distributed to the respective taxing districts by the County 24Collector in such proportions that each taxing district will 25receive therefrom such proportion as the tax rate of such 26taxing district bears to the total tax rate that would be   SB1377- 7 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1levied against such properties if they were not exempt from 2taxation under the Property Tax Code.3    The Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois, 4subject to the applicable civil service law, may appoint 5persons to be members of the University of Illinois Police 6Department. Members of the Police Department shall be peace 7officers and as such have all powers possessed by policemen in 8cities, and sheriffs, including the power to make arrests on 9view or warrants of violations of state statutes and city or 10county ordinances, except that they may exercise such powers 11only in counties wherein the University and any of its 12branches or properties are located when such is required for 13the protection of university properties and interests, and its 14students and personnel, and otherwise, within such counties, 15when requested by appropriate state or local law enforcement 16officials; provided, however, that such officer shall have no 17power to serve and execute civil processes. The chief of 18police of the Police Department has the final decision on all 19law enforcement decisions. The president and chancellors of 20the University are prohibited from being involved in law 21enforcement decisions. 22    The Board of Trustees must authorize to each member of the 23University of Illinois Police Department and to any other 24employee of the University of Illinois exercising the powers 25of a peace officer a distinct badge that, on its face, (i) 26clearly states that the badge is authorized by the University   SB1377- 8 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1of Illinois and (ii) contains a unique identifying number. No 2other badge shall be authorized by the University of Illinois. 3Nothing in this paragraph prohibits the Board of Trustees from 4issuing shields or other distinctive identification to 5employees not exercising the powers of a peace officer if the 6Board of Trustees determines that a shield or distinctive 7identification is needed by the employee to carry out his or 8her responsibilities.9    The Board of Trustees may own, operate, or govern, by or 10through the College of Medicine at Peoria, a managed care 11community network established under subsection (b) of Section 125-11 of the Illinois Public Aid Code.13    The powers of the trustees as herein designated are 14subject to the provisions of "An Act creating a Board of Higher 15Education, defining its powers and duties, making an 16appropriation therefor, and repealing an Act herein named", 17approved August 22, 1961, as amended.18    The Board of Trustees shall have the authority to adopt 19all administrative rules which may be necessary for the 20effective administration, enforcement and regulation of all 21matters for which the Board has jurisdiction or 22responsibility.23    (b) To assist in the provision of buildings and facilities 24beneficial to, useful for, or supportive of University 25purposes, the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois 26may exercise the following powers with regard to the area   SB1377- 9 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1located on or adjacent to the University of Illinois at 2Chicago campus and bounded as follows: on the West by Morgan 3Street; on the North by Roosevelt Road; on the East by Union 4Street; and on the South by 16th Street, in the City of 5Chicago: 6        (1) Acquire any interests in land, buildings, or 7    facilities by purchase, including installments payable 8    over a period allowed by law, by lease over a term of such 9    duration as the Board of Trustees shall determine, or by 10    exercise of the power of eminent domain; 11        (2) Sub-lease or contract to purchase through 12    installments all or any portion of buildings or facilities 13    for such duration and on such terms as the Board of 14    Trustees shall determine, including a term that exceeds 5 15    years, provided that each such lease or purchase contract 16    shall be and shall recite that it is subject to 17    termination and cancellation in any year for which the 18    General Assembly fails to make an appropriation to pay the 19    rent or purchase installments payable under the terms of 20    such lease or purchase contract; and 21        (3) Sell property without compliance with the State 22    Property Control Act and retain proceeds in the University 23    Treasury in a special, separate development fund account 24    which the Auditor General shall examine to assure 25    compliance with this Act.26Any buildings or facilities to be developed on the land shall   SB1377- 10 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1be buildings or facilities that, in the determination of the 2Board of Trustees, in whole or in part: (i) are for use by the 3University; or (ii) otherwise advance the interests of the 4University, including, by way of example, residential 5facilities for University staff and students and commercial 6facilities which provide services needed by the University 7community. Revenues from the development fund account may be 8withdrawn by the University for the purpose of demolition and 9the processes associated with demolition; routine land and 10property acquisition; extension of utilities; streetscape 11work; landscape work; surface and structure parking; 12sidewalks, recreational paths, and street construction; and 13lease and lease purchase arrangements and the professional 14services associated with the planning and development of the 15area. Moneys from the development fund account used for any 16other purpose must be deposited into and appropriated from the 17General Revenue Fund. Buildings or facilities leased to an 18entity or person other than the University shall not be 19subject to any limitations applicable to a State supported 20college or university under any law. All development on the 21land and all use of any buildings or facilities shall be 22subject to the control and approval of the Board of Trustees.23    (c) The Board of Trustees shall have the power to borrow 24money, as necessary, from time to time in anticipation of 25receiving tuition, payments from the State of Illinois, or 26other revenues or receipts of the University, also known as   SB1377- 11 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1anticipated moneys. The borrowing limit shall be capped at 2100% of the total amount of payroll and other expense vouchers 3submitted and payable to the University for fiscal year 2010 4expenses, but unpaid by the State Comptroller's office. Prior 5to borrowing any funds, the University shall request from the 6Comptroller's office a verification of the borrowing limit and 7shall include the estimated date on which such borrowing shall 8occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be verified by the State 9Comptroller's office not prior to 45 days before any estimated 10date for executing any promissory note or line of credit 11established under this subsection (c). The principal amount 12borrowed under a promissory note or line of credit shall not 13exceed 75% of the borrowing limit. Within 15 days after 14borrowing funds under any promissory note or line of credit 15established under this subsection (c), the University shall 16submit to the Governor's Office of Management and Budget, the 17Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Minority Leader 18of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, 19and the Minority Leader of the Senate an Emergency Short Term 20Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short Term Cash Management 21Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, the terms for 22repayment, the amount of outstanding State vouchers as 23verified by the State Comptroller's office, and the 24University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed funds, 25including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to meet payroll 26obligations to include collective bargaining employees, civil   SB1377- 12 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1service employees, and academic, research, and health care 2personnel. The establishment of any promissory note or line of 3credit established under this subsection (c) must be finalized 4within 90 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act 5of the 96th General Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be 6applied to the purposes of paying salaries and other expenses 7lawfully authorized in the University's State appropriation 8and unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 9established under this subsection (c) shall be paid in full 10one year after creation or within 10 days after the date the 11University receives reimbursement from the State for all 12submitted fiscal year 2010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. Any 13promissory note established under this subsection (c) shall be 14repaid within one year after issuance of the note. The 15Chairman, Comptroller, or Treasurer of the Board shall execute 16a promissory note or similar debt instrument to evidence the 17indebtedness incurred by the borrowing. In connection with a 18borrowing, the Board may establish a line of credit with a 19financial institution, investment bank, or broker/dealer. The 20obligation to make the payments due under any promissory note 21or line of credit established under this subsection (c) shall 22be a lawful obligation of the University payable from the 23anticipated moneys. Any borrowing under this subsection (c) 24shall not constitute a debt, legal or moral, of the State and 25shall not be enforceable against the State. The promissory 26note or line of credit shall be authorized by a resolution   SB1377- 13 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1passed by the Board and shall be valid whether or not a 2budgeted item with respect to that resolution is included in 3any annual or supplemental budget adopted by the Board. The 4resolution shall set forth facts demonstrating the need for 5the borrowing, state an amount that the amount to be borrowed 6will not exceed, and establish a maximum interest rate limit 7not to exceed the maximum rate authorized by the Bond 8Authorization Act or 9%, whichever is less. The resolution may 9direct the Comptroller or Treasurer of the Board to make 10arrangements to set apart and hold the portion of the 11anticipated moneys, as received, that shall be used to repay 12the borrowing, subject to any prior pledges or restrictions 13with respect to the anticipated moneys. The resolution may 14also authorize the Treasurer of the Board to make partial 15repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated moneys become 16available and may contain any other terms, restrictions, or 17limitations not inconsistent with the powers of the Board.18    For the purposes of this subsection (c), "financial 19institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois Banking 20Act, any savings and loan association subject to the Illinois 21Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any federally chartered 22commercial bank or savings and loan association or 23government-sponsored enterprise organized and operated in this 24State pursuant to the laws of the United States.25(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21.)   SB1377- 14 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Section 10. The Southern Illinois University Management 2Act is amended by changing Section 8 as follows: 3    (110 ILCS 520/8)  (from Ch. 144, par. 658)4    Sec. 8. Powers and duties of the Board. The Board shall 5have power and it shall be its duty:6        1. To make rules, regulations and by-laws, not 7    inconsistent with law, for the government and management 8    of Southern Illinois University and its branches.9        2. To employ, and, for good cause, to remove a 10    president of Southern Illinois University, and all 11    necessary deans, professors, associate professors, 12    assistant professors, instructors, and other educational 13    and administrative assistants, and all other necessary 14    employees, and contract with them upon matters relating to 15    tenure, salaries and retirement benefits in accordance 16    with the State Universities Civil Service Act; the Board 17    shall, upon the written request of an employee of Southern 18    Illinois University, withhold from the compensation of 19    that employee any dues, payments or contributions payable 20    by such employee to any labor organization as defined in 21    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. Under such 22    arrangement, an amount shall be withheld from each regular 23    payroll period which is equal to the pro rata share of the 24    annual dues plus any payments or contributions, and the 25    Board shall transmit such withholdings to the specified   SB1377- 15 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    labor organization within 10 working days from the time of 2    the withholding. Whenever the Board establishes a search 3    committee to fill the position of president of Southern 4    Illinois University, there shall be minority 5    representation, including women, on that search committee.6        3. To prescribe the course of study to be followed, 7    and textbooks and apparatus to be used at Southern 8    Illinois University.9        4. To issue upon the recommendation of the faculty, 10    diplomas to such persons as have satisfactorily completed 11    the required studies of Southern Illinois University, and 12    confer such professional and literary degrees as are 13    usually conferred by other institutions of like character 14    for similar or equivalent courses of study, or such as the 15    Board may deem appropriate.16        5. To examine into the conditions, management, and 17    administration of Southern Illinois University, to provide 18    the requisite buildings, apparatus, equipment and 19    auxiliary enterprises, and to fix and collect 20    matriculation fees; tuition fees; fees for student 21    activities; fees for student facilities such as student 22    union buildings or field houses or stadium or other 23    recreational facilities; student welfare fees; laboratory 24    fees and similar fees for supplies and material.25        6. To succeed to and to administer all trusts, trust 26    property, and gifts now or hereafter belonging or   SB1377- 16 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    pertaining to Southern Illinois University.2        7. To accept endowments of professorships or 3    departments in the University from any person who may 4    proffer them and, at regular meetings, to prescribe rules 5    and regulations in relation to endowments and declare on 6    what general principles they may be accepted.7        8. To enter into contracts with the Federal government 8    for providing courses of instruction and other services at 9    Southern Illinois University for persons serving in or 10    with the military or naval forces of the United States, 11    and to provide such courses of instruction and other 12    services.13        9. To provide for the receipt and expenditures of 14    Federal funds, paid to the Southern Illinois University by 15    the Federal government for instruction and other services 16    for persons serving in or with the military or naval 17    forces of the United States and to provide for audits of 18    such funds.19        10. To appoint, subject to the applicable civil 20    service law, persons to be members of the Southern 21    Illinois University Police Department. Members of the 22    Police Department shall be conservators of the peace and 23    as such have all powers possessed by policemen in cities, 24    and sheriffs, including the power to make arrests on view 25    or warrants of violations of state statutes, university 26    rules and regulations and city or county ordinances,   SB1377- 17 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    except that they may exercise such powers only within 2    counties wherein the university and any of its branches or 3    properties are located when such is required for the 4    protection of university properties and interests, and its 5    students and personnel, and otherwise, within such 6    counties, when requested by appropriate State or local law 7    enforcement officials. However, such officers shall have 8    no power to serve and execute civil processes. The chief 9    of police of the Police Department has the final decision 10    on all law enforcement decisions. The president and 11    chancellors of the University are prohibited from being 12    involved in law enforcement decisions. 13        The Board must authorize to each member of the 14    Southern Illinois University Police Department and to any 15    other employee of Southern Illinois University exercising 16    the powers of a peace officer a distinct badge that, on its 17    face, (i) clearly states that the badge is authorized by 18    Southern Illinois University and (ii) contains a unique 19    identifying number. No other badge shall be authorized by 20    Southern Illinois University.21        10.5. To conduct health care programs in furtherance 22    of its teaching, research, and public service functions, 23    which shall include without limitation patient and 24    ancillary facilities, institutes, clinics, or offices 25    owned, leased, or purchased through an equity interest by 26    the Board or its appointed designee to carry out such   SB1377- 18 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    activities in the course of or in support of the Board's 2    academic, clinical, and public service responsibilities. 3        11. To administer a plan or plans established by the 4    clinical faculty of the School of Medicine or the School 5    of Dental Medicine for the billing, collection and 6    disbursement of charges for services performed in the 7    course of or in support of the faculty's academic 8    responsibilities, provided that such plan has been first 9    approved by Board action. All such collections shall be 10    deposited into a special fund or funds administered by the 11    Board from which disbursements may be made according to 12    the provisions of said plan. The reasonable costs 13    incurred, by the University, administering the billing, 14    collection and disbursement provisions of a plan shall 15    have first priority for payment before distribution or 16    disbursement for any other purpose. Audited financial 17    statements of the plan or plans must be provided to the 18    Legislative Audit Commission annually.19        The Board of Trustees may own, operate, or govern, by 20    or through the School of Medicine, a managed care 21    community network established under subsection (b) of 22    Section 5-11 of the Illinois Public Aid Code.23        12. The Board of Trustees may, directly or in 24    cooperation with other institutions of higher education, 25    acquire by purchase or lease or otherwise, and construct, 26    enlarge, improve, equip, complete, operate, control and   SB1377- 19 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    manage medical research and high technology parks, 2    together with the necessary lands, buildings, facilities, 3    equipment, and personal property therefor, to encourage 4    and facilitate (a) the location and development of 5    business and industry in the State of Illinois, and (b) 6    the increased application and development of technology 7    and (c) the improvement and development of the State's 8    economy. The Board of Trustees may lease to nonprofit 9    corporations all or any part of the land, buildings, 10    facilities, equipment or other property included in a 11    medical research and high technology park upon such terms 12    and conditions as the Board of Trustees may deem advisable 13    and enter into any contract or agreement with such 14    nonprofit corporations as may be necessary or suitable for 15    the construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 16    management of any such park; and may lease to any person, 17    firm, partnership or corporation, either public or 18    private, any part or all of the land, building, 19    facilities, equipment or other property of such park for 20    such purposes and upon such rentals, terms and conditions 21    as the Board of Trustees may deem advisable; and may 22    finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including 23    the purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, 24    improvement, remodeling, addition to, and extension and 25    maintenance of all or part of such high technology park, 26    and all equipment and furnishings, by legislative   SB1377- 20 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    appropriations, government grants, contracts, private 2    gifts, loans, receipts from the operation of such high 3    technology park, rentals and similar receipts; and may 4    make its other facilities and services available to 5    tenants or other occupants of any such park at rates which 6    are reasonable and appropriate.7        13. To borrow money, as necessary, from time to time 8    in anticipation of receiving tuition, payments from the 9    State of Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the 10    University, also known as anticipated moneys. The 11    borrowing limit shall be capped at 100% of the total 12    amount of payroll and other expense vouchers submitted and 13    payable to the University for fiscal year 2010 expenses, 14    but unpaid by the State Comptroller's office. Prior to 15    borrowing any funds, the University shall request from the 16    Comptroller's office a verification of the borrowing limit 17    and shall include the estimated date on which such 18    borrowing shall occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be 19    verified by the State Comptroller's office not prior to 45 20    days before any estimated date for executing any 21    promissory note or line of credit established under this 22    item 13. The principal amount borrowed under a promissory 23    note or line of credit shall not exceed 75% of the 24    borrowing limit. Within 15 days after borrowing funds 25    under any promissory note or line of credit established 26    under this item 13, the University shall submit to the   SB1377- 21 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Governor's Office of Management and Budget, the Speaker of 2    the House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the 3    House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, and 4    the Minority Leader of the Senate an Emergency Short Term 5    Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short Term Cash 6    Management Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, the 7    terms for repayment, the amount of outstanding State 8    vouchers as verified by the State Comptroller's office, 9    and the University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed 10    funds, including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to 11    meet payroll obligations to include collective bargaining 12    employees, civil service employees, and academic, 13    research, and health care personnel. The establishment of 14    any promissory note or line of credit established under 15    this item 13 must be finalized within 90 days after the 16    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 17    Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be applied to the 18    purposes of paying salaries and other expenses lawfully 19    authorized in the University's State appropriation and 20    unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 21    established under this item 13 shall be paid in full one 22    year after creation or within 10 days after the date the 23    University receives reimbursement from the State for all 24    submitted fiscal year 2010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. 25    Any promissory note established under this item 13 shall 26    be repaid within one year after issuance of the note. The   SB1377- 22 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Chairman, Comptroller, or Treasurer of the Board shall 2    execute a promissory note or similar debt instrument to 3    evidence the indebtedness incurred by the borrowing. In 4    connection with a borrowing, the Board may establish a 5    line of credit with a financial institution, investment 6    bank, or broker/dealer. The obligation to make the 7    payments due under any promissory note or line of credit 8    established under this item 13 shall be a lawful 9    obligation of the University payable from the anticipated 10    moneys. Any borrowing under this item 13 shall not 11    constitute a debt, legal or moral, of the State and shall 12    not be enforceable against the State. The promissory note 13    or line of credit shall be authorized by a resolution 14    passed by the Board and shall be valid whether or not a 15    budgeted item with respect to that resolution is included 16    in any annual or supplemental budget adopted by the Board. 17    The resolution shall set forth facts demonstrating the 18    need for the borrowing, state an amount that the amount to 19    be borrowed will not exceed, and establish a maximum 20    interest rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate 21    authorized by the Bond Authorization Act or 9%, whichever 22    is less. The resolution may direct the Comptroller or 23    Treasurer of the Board to make arrangements to set apart 24    and hold the portion of the anticipated moneys, as 25    received, that shall be used to repay the borrowing, 26    subject to any prior pledges or restrictions with respect   SB1377- 23 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    to the anticipated moneys. The resolution may also 2    authorize the Treasurer of the Board to make partial 3    repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated moneys 4    become available and may contain any other terms, 5    restrictions, or limitations not inconsistent with the 6    powers of the Board.7        For the purposes of this item 13, "financial 8    institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois 9    Banking Act, any savings and loan association subject to 10    the Illinois Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any 11    federally chartered commercial bank or savings and loan 12    association or government-sponsored enterprise organized 13    and operated in this State pursuant to the laws of the 14    United States.15    The powers of the Board as herein designated are subject 16to the Board of Higher Education Act.17(Source: P.A. 100-400, eff. 8-25-17.) 18    Section 15. The Chicago State University Law is amended by 19changing Section 5-45 as follows: 20    (110 ILCS 660/5-45)21    Sec. 5-45. Powers and duties. The Board also shall have 22power and it shall be its duty:23    (1) To make rules, regulations and bylaws, not 24inconsistent with law, for the government and management of   SB1377- 24 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1Chicago State University and its branches;2    (2) To employ, and, for good cause, to remove a President 3of Chicago State University, and all necessary deans, 4professors, associate professors, assistant professors, 5instructors, other educational and administrative assistants, 6and all other necessary employees, and to prescribe their 7duties and contract with them upon matters relating to tenure, 8salaries and retirement benefits in accordance with the State 9Universities Civil Service Act. Whenever the Board establishes 10a search committee to fill the position of President of 11Chicago State University, there shall be minority 12representation, including women, on that search committee. The 13Board shall, upon the written request of an employee of 14Chicago State University, withhold from the compensation of 15that employee any dues, payments or contributions payable by 16such employee to any labor organization as defined in the 17Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. Under such 18arrangement, an amount shall be withheld from each regular 19payroll period which is equal to the pro rata share of the 20annual dues plus any payments or contributions, and the Board 21shall transmit such withholdings to the specified labor 22organization within 10 working days from the time of the 23withholding;24    (3) To prescribe the courses of study to be followed, and 25textbooks and apparatus to be used at Chicago State 26University;  SB1377- 25 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    (4) To issue upon the recommendation of the faculty, 2diplomas to such persons as have satisfactorily completed the 3required studies of Chicago State University, and confer such 4professional and literary degrees as are usually conferred by 5other institutions of like character for similar or equivalent 6courses of study, or such as the Board may deem appropriate;7    (5) To examine into the conditions, management, and 8administration of Chicago State University, to provide the 9requisite buildings, apparatus, equipment and auxiliary 10enterprises, and to fix and collect matriculation fees; 11tuition fees; fees for student activities; fees for student 12facilities such as student union buildings or field houses or 13stadia or other recreational facilities; student welfare fees; 14laboratory fees; and similar fees for supplies and materials. 15The expense of the building, improving, repairing and 16supplying fuel and furniture and the necessary appliances and 17apparatus for conducting Chicago State University, the 18reimbursed expenses of members of the Board, and the salaries 19or compensation of the President, assistants, agents and other 20employees of Chicago State University, shall be a charge upon 21the State Treasury. All other expenses shall be chargeable 22against students, and the Board shall regulate the charges 23accordingly;24    (6) To succeed to and to administer all trusts, trust 25property, and gifts now or hereafter belonging or pertaining 26to Chicago State University;  SB1377- 26 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    (7) To accept endowments of professorships or departments 2in Chicago State University from any person who may proffer 3them and, at regular meetings, to prescribe rules and 4regulations in relation to endowments and declare on what 5general principles they may be accepted;6    (8) To enter into contracts with the Federal government 7for providing courses of instruction and other services at 8Chicago State University for persons serving in or with the 9military or naval forces of the United States, and to provide 10such courses of instruction and other services;11    (9) To contract with respect to the Cooperative Computer 12Center to obtain services related to electronic data 13processing;14    (10) To provide for the receipt and expenditures of 15Federal funds paid to Chicago State University by the Federal 16government for instruction and other services for persons 17serving in or with the military or naval forces of the United 18States, and to provide for audits of such funds;19    (11) To appoint, subject to the applicable civil service 20law, persons to be members of the Chicago State University 21Police Department. Members of the Police Department shall be 22conservators of the peace and as such have all powers 23possessed by policemen in cities, and sheriffs, including the 24power to make arrests on view or warrants of violations of 25State statutes, University rules and regulations and city or 26county ordinances, except that they may exercise such powers   SB1377- 27 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1only within counties wherein Chicago State University and any 2of its branches or properties are located when such is 3required for the protection of University properties and 4interests, and its students and personnel, and otherwise, 5within such counties, when requested by appropriate State or 6local law enforcement officials. However, such officers shall 7have no power to serve and execute civil processes. The chief 8of police of the Police Department has the final decision on 9all law enforcement decisions. The President and chancellors 10of the University are prohibited from being involved in law 11enforcement decisions. 12    The Board must authorize to each member of the Chicago 13State University Police Department and to any other employee 14of Chicago State University exercising the powers of a peace 15officer a distinct badge that, on its face, (i) clearly states 16that the badge is authorized by Chicago State University and 17(ii) contains a unique identifying number on its face. No 18other badge shall be authorized by Chicago State University;19    (12) The Board may, directly or in cooperation with other 20institutions of higher education, acquire by purchase or lease 21or otherwise, and construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 22complete, operate, control and manage research and high 23technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 24buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 25therefor, to encourage and facilitate (i) the location and 26development of business and industry in the State of Illinois,   SB1377- 28 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1and (ii) the increased application and development of 2technology, and (iii) the improvement and development of the 3State's economy. The Board may lease to nonprofit corporations 4all or any part of the land, buildings, facilities, equipment 5or other property included in a research and high technology 6park upon such terms and conditions as the Board may deem 7advisable and enter into any contract or agreement with such 8nonprofit corporations as may be necessary or suitable for the 9construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 10management of any such park; and may lease to any person, firm, 11partnership or corporation, either public or private, any part 12or all of the land, building, facilities, equipment or other 13property of such park for such purposes and upon such rentals, 14terms and conditions as the Board may deem advisable; and may 15finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including the 16purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, improvement, 17remodeling, addition to, and extension and maintenance of all 18or part of such high technology park, and all equipment and 19furnishings, by legislative appropriations, government grants, 20contracts, private gifts, loans, receipts from the operation 21of such high technology park, rentals and similar receipts; 22and may make its other facilities and services available to 23tenants or other occupants of any such park at rates which are 24reasonable and appropriate;25    (13) To borrow money, as necessary, from time to time in 26anticipation of receiving tuition, payments from the State of   SB1377- 29 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the University, 2also known as anticipated moneys. The borrowing limit shall be 3capped at 100% of the total amount of payroll and other expense 4vouchers submitted and payable to the University for fiscal 5year 2010 expenses, but unpaid by the State Comptroller's 6office. Prior to borrowing any funds, the University shall 7request from the Comptroller's office a verification of the 8borrowing limit and shall include the estimated date on which 9such borrowing shall occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be 10verified by the State Comptroller's office not prior to 45 11days before any estimated date for executing any promissory 12note or line of credit established under this item (13). The 13principal amount borrowed under a promissory note or line of 14credit shall not exceed 75% of the borrowing limit. Within 15 15days after borrowing funds under any promissory note or line 16of credit established under this item (13), the University 17shall submit to the Governor's Office of Management and 18Budget, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 19Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the President 20of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the Senate an 21Emergency Short Term Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short 22Term Cash Management Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, 23the terms for repayment, the amount of outstanding State 24vouchers as verified by the State Comptroller's office, and 25the University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed funds, 26including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to meet payroll   SB1377- 30 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1obligations to include collective bargaining employees, civil 2service employees, and academic, research, and health care 3personnel. The establishment of any promissory note or line of 4credit established under this item (13) must be finalized 5within 90 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act 6of the 96th General Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be 7applied to the purposes of paying salaries and other expenses 8lawfully authorized in the University's State appropriation 9and unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 10established under this item (13) shall be paid in full one year 11after creation or within 10 days after the date the University 12receives reimbursement from the State for all submitted fiscal 13year 2010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. Any promissory note 14established under this item (13) shall be repaid within one 15year after issuance of the note. The Chairman, Comptroller, or 16Treasurer of the Board shall execute a promissory note or 17similar debt instrument to evidence the indebtedness incurred 18by the borrowing. In connection with a borrowing, the Board 19may establish a line of credit with a financial institution, 20investment bank, or broker/dealer. The obligation to make the 21payments due under any promissory note or line of credit 22established under this item (13) shall be a lawful obligation 23of the University payable from the anticipated moneys. Any 24borrowing under this item (13) shall not constitute a debt, 25legal or moral, of the State and shall not be enforceable 26against the State. The promissory note or line of credit shall   SB1377- 31 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1be authorized by a resolution passed by the Board and shall be 2valid whether or not a budgeted item with respect to that 3resolution is included in any annual or supplemental budget 4adopted by the Board. The resolution shall set forth facts 5demonstrating the need for the borrowing, state an amount that 6the amount to be borrowed will not exceed, and establish a 7maximum interest rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate 8authorized by the Bond Authorization Act or 9%, whichever is 9less. The resolution may direct the Comptroller or Treasurer 10of the Board to make arrangements to set apart and hold the 11portion of the anticipated moneys, as received, that shall be 12used to repay the borrowing, subject to any prior pledges or 13restrictions with respect to the anticipated moneys. The 14resolution may also authorize the Treasurer of the Board to 15make partial repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated 16moneys become available and may contain any other terms, 17restrictions, or limitations not inconsistent with the powers 18of the Board.19    For the purposes of this item (13), "financial 20institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois Banking 21Act, any savings and loan association subject to the Illinois 22Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any federally chartered 23commercial bank or savings and loan association or 24government-sponsored enterprise organized and operated in this 25State pursuant to the laws of the United States.26(Source: P.A. 96-909, eff. 6-8-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.)   SB1377- 32 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Section 20. The Eastern Illinois University Law is amended 2by changing Section 10-45 as follows: 3    (110 ILCS 665/10-45)4    Sec. 10-45. Powers and duties. 5    (a) The Board also shall have power and it shall be its 6duty: 7        (1) To make rules, regulations and bylaws, not 8    inconsistent with law, for the government and management 9    of Eastern Illinois University and its branches. 10        (2) To employ, and, for good cause, to remove a 11    President of Eastern Illinois University, and all 12    necessary deans, professors, associate professors, 13    assistant professors, instructors, other educational and 14    administrative assistants, and all other necessary 15    employees, and to prescribe their duties and contract with 16    them upon matters relating to tenure, salaries and 17    retirement benefits in accordance with the State 18    Universities Civil Service Act. Whenever the Board 19    establishes a search committee to fill the position of 20    President of Eastern Illinois University, there shall be 21    minority representation, including women, on that search 22    committee. The Board shall, upon the written request of an 23    employee of Eastern Illinois University, withhold from the 24    compensation of that employee any dues, payments or   SB1377- 33 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    contributions payable by such employee to any labor 2    organization as defined in the Illinois Educational Labor 3    Relations Act. Under such arrangement, an amount shall be 4    withheld from each regular payroll period which is equal 5    to the pro rata share of the annual dues plus any payments 6    or contributions, and the Board shall transmit such 7    withholdings to the specified labor organization within 10 8    working days from the time of the withholding. 9        (3) To prescribe the courses of study to be followed, 10    and textbooks and apparatus to be used at Eastern Illinois 11    University. 12        (4) To issue upon the recommendation of the faculty, 13    diplomas to such persons as have satisfactorily completed 14    the required studies of Eastern Illinois University, and 15    confer such professional and literary degrees as are 16    usually conferred by other institutions of like character 17    for similar or equivalent courses of study, or such as the 18    Board may deem appropriate. 19        (5) To examine into the conditions, management, and 20    administration of Eastern Illinois University, to provide 21    the requisite buildings, apparatus, equipment and 22    auxiliary enterprises, and to fix and collect 23    matriculation fees; tuition fees; fees for student 24    activities; fees for student facilities such as student 25    union buildings or field houses or stadia or other 26    recreational facilities; student welfare fees; laboratory   SB1377- 34 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    fees; and similar fees for supplies and materials. The 2    expense of the building, improving, repairing and 3    supplying fuel and furniture and the necessary appliances 4    and apparatus for conducting Eastern Illinois University, 5    the reimbursed expenses of members of the Board, and the 6    salaries or compensation of the President, assistants, 7    agents and other employees of Eastern Illinois University, 8    shall be a charge upon the State Treasury. All other 9    expenses shall be chargeable against students, and the 10    Board shall regulate the charges accordingly. 11        (6) To succeed to and to administer all trusts, trust 12    property, and gifts now or hereafter belonging or 13    pertaining to Eastern Illinois University. 14        (7) To accept endowments of professorships or 15    departments in Eastern Illinois University from any person 16    who may proffer them and, at regular meetings, to 17    prescribe rules and regulations in relation to endowments 18    and declare on what general principles they may be 19    accepted. 20        (8) To enter into contracts with the Federal 21    government for providing courses of instruction and other 22    services at Eastern Illinois University for persons 23    serving in or with the military or naval forces of the 24    United States, and to provide such courses of instruction 25    and other services. 26        (9) To contract with respect to the Cooperative   SB1377- 35 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Computer Center to obtain services related to electronic 2    data processing. 3        (10) To provide for the receipt and expenditures of 4    Federal funds paid to Eastern Illinois University by the 5    Federal government for instruction and other services for 6    persons serving in or with the military or naval forces of 7    the United States, and to provide for audits of such 8    funds. 9        (11) To appoint, subject to the applicable civil 10    service law, persons to be members of the Eastern Illinois 11    University Police Department. Members of the Police 12    Department shall be conservators of the peace and as such 13    have all powers possessed by policemen in cities, and 14    sheriffs, including the power to make arrests on view or 15    warrants of violations of State statutes, University rules 16    and regulations and city or county ordinances, except that 17    they may exercise such powers only within counties wherein 18    Eastern Illinois University and any of its branches or 19    properties are located when such is required for the 20    protection of University properties and interests, and its 21    students and personnel, and otherwise, within such 22    counties, when requested by appropriate State or local law 23    enforcement officials. However, such officers shall have 24    no power to serve and execute civil processes. The chief 25    of police of the Police Department has the final decision 26    on all law enforcement decisions. The President and   SB1377- 36 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    chancellors of the University are prohibited from being 2    involved in law enforcement decisions. 3        The Board must authorize to each member of the Eastern 4    Illinois University Police Department and to any other 5    employee of Eastern Illinois University exercising the 6    powers of a peace officer a distinct badge that, on its 7    face, (i) clearly states that the badge is authorized by 8    Eastern Illinois University and (ii) contains a unique 9    identifying number. No other badge shall be authorized by 10    Eastern Illinois University.11        (12) To borrow money, as necessary, from time to time 12    in anticipation of receiving tuition, payments from the 13    State of Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the 14    University, also known as anticipated moneys. The 15    borrowing limit shall be capped at 100% of the total 16    amount of payroll and other expense vouchers submitted and 17    payable to the University for fiscal year 2010 expenses, 18    but unpaid by the State Comptroller's office. Prior to 19    borrowing any funds, the University shall request from the 20    Comptroller's office a verification of the borrowing limit 21    and shall include the estimated date on which such 22    borrowing shall occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be 23    verified by the State Comptroller's office not prior to 45 24    days before any estimated date for executing any 25    promissory note or line of credit established under this 26    item (12). The principal amount borrowed under a   SB1377- 37 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    promissory note or line of credit shall not exceed 75% of 2    the borrowing limit. Within 15 days after borrowing funds 3    under any promissory note or line of credit established 4    under this item (12), the University shall submit to the 5    Governor's Office of Management and Budget, the Speaker of 6    the House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the 7    House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, and 8    the Minority Leader of the Senate an Emergency Short Term 9    Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short Term Cash 10    Management Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, the 11    terms for repayment, the amount of outstanding State 12    vouchers as verified by the State Comptroller's office, 13    and the University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed 14    funds, including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to 15    meet payroll obligations to include collective bargaining 16    employees, civil service employees, and academic, 17    research, and health care personnel. The establishment of 18    any promissory note or line of credit established under 19    this item (12) must be finalized within 90 days after the 20    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 21    Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be applied to the 22    purposes of paying salaries and other expenses lawfully 23    authorized in the University's State appropriation and 24    unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 25    established under this item (12) shall be paid in full one 26    year after creation or within 10 days after the date the   SB1377- 38 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    University receives reimbursement from the State for all 2    submitted fiscal year 2010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. 3    Any promissory note established under this item (12) shall 4    be repaid within one year after issuance of the note. The 5    Chairman, Comptroller, or Treasurer of the Board shall 6    execute a promissory note or similar debt instrument to 7    evidence the indebtedness incurred by the borrowing. In 8    connection with a borrowing, the Board may establish a 9    line of credit with a financial institution, investment 10    bank, or broker/dealer. The obligation to make the 11    payments due under any promissory note or line of credit 12    established under this item (12) shall be a lawful 13    obligation of the University payable from the anticipated 14    moneys. Any borrowing under this item (12) shall not 15    constitute a debt, legal or moral, of the State and shall 16    not be enforceable against the State. The promissory note 17    or line of credit shall be authorized by a resolution 18    passed by the Board and shall be valid whether or not a 19    budgeted item with respect to that resolution is included 20    in any annual or supplemental budget adopted by the Board. 21    The resolution shall set forth facts demonstrating the 22    need for the borrowing, state an amount that the amount to 23    be borrowed will not exceed, and establish a maximum 24    interest rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate 25    authorized by the Bond Authorization Act or 9%, whichever 26    is less. The resolution may direct the Comptroller or   SB1377- 39 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Treasurer of the Board to make arrangements to set apart 2    and hold the portion of the anticipated moneys, as 3    received, that shall be used to repay the borrowing, 4    subject to any prior pledges or restrictions with respect 5    to the anticipated moneys. The resolution may also 6    authorize the Treasurer of the Board to make partial 7    repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated moneys 8    become available and may contain any other terms, 9    restrictions, or limitations not inconsistent with the 10    powers of the Board.11        For the purposes of this item (12), "financial 12    institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois 13    Banking Act, any savings and loan association subject to 14    the Illinois Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any 15    federally chartered commercial bank or savings and loan 16    association or government-sponsored enterprise organized 17    and operated in this State pursuant to the laws of the 18    United States.19    (b) The Board may, directly or in cooperation with other 20institutions of higher education, acquire by purchase or lease 21or otherwise, and construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 22complete, operate, control and manage research and high 23technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 24buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 25therefor, to encourage and facilitate (i) the location and 26development of business and industry in the State of Illinois,   SB1377- 40 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1and (ii) the increased application and development of 2technology, and (iii) the improvement and development of the 3State's economy. The Board may lease to nonprofit corporations 4all or any part of the land, buildings, facilities, equipment 5or other property included in a research and high technology 6park upon such terms and conditions as the Board may deem 7advisable and enter into any contract or agreement with such 8nonprofit corporations as may be necessary or suitable for the 9construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 10management of any such park; and may lease to any person, firm, 11partnership or corporation, either public or private, any part 12or all of the land, building, facilities, equipment or other 13property of such park for such purposes and upon such rentals, 14terms and conditions as the Board may deem advisable; and may 15finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including the 16purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, improvement, 17remodeling, addition to, and extension and maintenance of all 18or part of such high technology park, and all equipment and 19furnishings, by legislative appropriations, government grants, 20contracts, private gifts, loans, receipts from the operation 21of such high technology park, rentals and similar receipts; 22and may make its other facilities and services available to 23tenants or other occupants of any such park at rates which are 24reasonable and appropriate.25    (c) The Board may sell the following described property 26without compliance with the State Property Control Act and   SB1377- 41 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1retain the proceeds in the University treasury in a special, 2separate development fund account that the Auditor General 3shall examine to assure compliance with this Law: 4    Lots 511 and 512 in Heritage Woods V, Charleston, Coles 5    County, Illinois.6Revenues from the development fund account may be withdrawn by 7the University for the purpose of upgrading the on-campus 8formal reception facility. Moneys from the development fund 9account used for any other purpose must be deposited into and 10appropriated from the General Revenue Fund.11(Source: P.A. 96-909, eff. 6-8-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 12    Section 25. The Governors State University Law is amended 13by changing Section 15-45 as follows: 14    (110 ILCS 670/15-45)15    Sec. 15-45. Powers and duties. The Board also shall have 16power and it shall be its duty:17    (1) To make rules, regulations and bylaws, not 18inconsistent with law, for the government and management of 19Governors State University and its branches;20    (2) To employ, and, for good cause, to remove a President 21of Governors State University, and all necessary deans, 22professors, associate professors, assistant professors, 23instructors, other educational and administrative assistants, 24and all other necessary employees, and to prescribe their   SB1377- 42 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1duties and contract with them upon matters relating to tenure, 2salaries and retirement benefits in accordance with the State 3Universities Civil Service Act. Whenever the Board establishes 4a search committee to fill the position of President of 5Governors State University, there shall be minority 6representation, including women, on that search committee. The 7Board shall, upon the written request of an employee of 8Governors State University, withhold from the compensation of 9that employee any dues, payments or contributions payable by 10such employee to any labor organization as defined in the 11Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. Under such 12arrangement, an amount shall be withheld from each regular 13payroll period which is equal to the pro rata share of the 14annual dues plus any payments or contributions, and the Board 15shall transmit such withholdings to the specified labor 16organization within 10 working days from the time of the 17withholding;18    (3) To prescribe the courses of study to be followed, and 19textbooks and apparatus to be used at Governors State 20University;21    (4) To issue upon the recommendation of the faculty, 22diplomas to such persons as have satisfactorily completed the 23required studies of Governors State University, and confer 24such professional and literary degrees as are usually 25conferred by other institutions of like character for similar 26or equivalent courses of study, or such as the Board may deem   SB1377- 43 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1appropriate;2    (5) To examine into the conditions, management, and 3administration of Governors State University, to provide the 4requisite buildings, apparatus, equipment and auxiliary 5enterprises, and to fix and collect matriculation fees; 6tuition fees; fees for student activities; fees for student 7facilities such as student union buildings or field houses or 8stadia or other recreational facilities; student welfare fees; 9laboratory fees; and similar fees for supplies and materials. 10The expense of the building, improving, repairing and 11supplying fuel and furniture and the necessary appliances and 12apparatus for conducting Governors State University, the 13reimbursed expenses of members of the Board, and the salaries 14or compensation of the President, assistants, agents and other 15employees of Governors State University, shall be a charge 16upon the State Treasury. All other expenses shall be 17chargeable against students, and the Board shall regulate the 18charges accordingly;19    (6) To succeed to and to administer all trusts, trust 20property, and gifts now or hereafter belonging or pertaining 21to Governors State University;22    (7) To accept endowments of professorships or departments 23in Governors State University from any person who may proffer 24them and, at regular meetings, to prescribe rules and 25regulations in relation to endowments and declare on what 26general principles they may be accepted;  SB1377- 44 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    (8) To enter into contracts with the Federal government 2for providing courses of instruction and other services at 3Governors State University for persons serving in or with the 4military or naval forces of the United States, and to provide 5such courses of instruction and other services;6    (9) To operate, maintain, and contract with respect to the 7Cooperative Computer Center for its own purposes and to 8provide services related to electronic data processing to 9other public and private colleges and universities, to 10governmental agencies, and to public or private not-for-profit 11agencies; and to examine the conditions, management, and 12administration of the Cooperative Computer Center;13    (10) To provide for the receipt and expenditures of 14Federal funds paid to Governors State University by the 15Federal government for instruction and other services for 16persons serving in or with the military or naval forces of the 17United States, and to provide for audits of such funds;18    (11) To appoint, subject to the applicable civil service 19law, persons to be members of the Governors State University 20Police Department. Members of the Police Department shall be 21conservators of the peace and as such have all powers 22possessed by policemen in cities, and sheriffs, including the 23power to make arrests on view or warrants of violations of 24State statutes, University rules and regulations and city or 25county ordinances, except that they may exercise such powers 26only within counties wherein Governors State University and   SB1377- 45 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1any of its branches or properties are located when such is 2required for the protection of University properties and 3interests, and its students and personnel, and otherwise, 4within such counties, when requested by appropriate State or 5local law enforcement officials. However, such officers shall 6have no power to serve and execute civil processes. The chief 7of police of the Police Department has the final decision on 8all law enforcement decisions. The President and chancellors 9of the University are prohibited from being involved in law 10enforcement decisions. 11    The Board must authorize to each member of the Governors 12State University Police Department and to any other employee 13of Governors State University exercising the powers of a peace 14officer a distinct badge that, on its face, (i) clearly states 15that the badge is authorized by Governors State University and 16(ii) contains a unique identifying number. No other badge 17shall be authorized by Governors State University;18    (12) The Board may, directly or in cooperation with other 19institutions of higher education, acquire by purchase or lease 20or otherwise, and construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 21complete, operate, control and manage research and high 22technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 23buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 24therefor, to encourage and facilitate (i) the location and 25development of business and industry in the State of Illinois, 26and (ii) the increased application and development of   SB1377- 46 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1technology, and (iii) the improvement and development of the 2State's economy. The Board may lease to nonprofit corporations 3all or any part of the land, buildings, facilities, equipment 4or other property included in a research and high technology 5park upon such terms and conditions as the Board may deem 6advisable and enter into any contract or agreement with such 7nonprofit corporations as may be necessary or suitable for the 8construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 9management of any such park; and may lease to any person, firm, 10partnership or corporation, either public or private, any part 11or all of the land, building, facilities, equipment or other 12property of such park for such purposes and upon such rentals, 13terms and conditions as the Board may deem advisable; and may 14finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including the 15purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, improvement, 16remodeling, addition to, and extension and maintenance of all 17or part of such high technology park, and all equipment and 18furnishings, by legislative appropriations, government grants, 19contracts, private gifts, loans, receipts from the operation 20of such high technology park, rentals and similar receipts; 21and may make its other facilities and services available to 22tenants or other occupants of any such park at rates which are 23reasonable and appropriate;24    (13) To borrow money, as necessary, from time to time in 25anticipation of receiving tuition, payments from the State of 26Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the University,   SB1377- 47 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1also known as anticipated moneys. The borrowing limit shall be 2capped at 100% of the total amount of payroll and other expense 3vouchers submitted and payable to the University for fiscal 4year 2010 expenses, but unpaid by the State Comptroller's 5office. Prior to borrowing any funds, the University shall 6request from the Comptroller's office a verification of the 7borrowing limit and shall include the estimated date on which 8such borrowing shall occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be 9verified by the State Comptroller's office not prior to 45 10days before any estimated date for executing any promissory 11note or line of credit established under this item (13). The 12principal amount borrowed under a promissory note or line of 13credit shall not exceed 75% of the borrowing limit. Within 15 14days after borrowing funds under any promissory note or line 15of credit established under this item (13), the University 16shall submit to the Governor's Office of Management and 17Budget, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 18Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the President 19of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the Senate an 20Emergency Short Term Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short 21Term Cash Management Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, 22the terms for repayment, the amount of outstanding State 23vouchers as verified by the State Comptroller's office, and 24the University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed funds, 25including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to meet payroll 26obligations for all collective bargaining employees, civil   SB1377- 48 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1service employees, and academic, research, and health care 2personnel. The establishment of any promissory note or line of 3credit established under this item (13) must be finalized 4within 90 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act 5of the 96th General Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be 6applied to the purposes of paying salaries and other expenses 7lawfully authorized in the University's State appropriation 8and unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 9established under this item (13) shall be paid in full one year 10after creation or on such date as the University receives 11reimbursement from the State for all submitted fiscal year 122010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. Any promissory note 13established under this item (13) shall be repaid within one 14year after issuance of the note. The Chairman, Comptroller, or 15Treasurer of the Board shall execute a promissory note or 16similar debt instrument to evidence the indebtedness incurred 17by the borrowing. In connection with a borrowing, the Board 18may establish a line of credit with a financial institution, 19investment bank, or broker/dealer. The obligation to make the 20payments due under any promissory note or line of credit 21established under this item (13) shall be a lawful obligation 22of the University payable from the anticipated moneys. Any 23borrowing under this item (13) shall not constitute a debt, 24legal or moral, of the State and shall not be enforceable 25against the State. The line of credit shall be authorized by a 26resolution passed by the Board and shall be valid whether or   SB1377- 49 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1not a budgeted item with respect to that resolution is 2included in any annual or supplemental budget adopted by the 3Board. The resolution shall set forth facts demonstrating the 4need for the borrowing, state an amount that the amount to be 5borrowed will not exceed, and establish a maximum interest 6rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate authorized by the 7Bond Authorization Act or 9%, whichever is less. The 8resolution may direct the Comptroller or Treasurer of the 9Board to make arrangements to set apart and hold the portion of 10the anticipated moneys, as received, that shall be used to 11repay the borrowing, subject to any prior pledges or 12restrictions with respect to the anticipated moneys. The 13resolution may also authorize the Treasurer of the Board to 14make partial repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated 15moneys become available and may contain any other terms, 16restrictions, or limitations not inconsistent with the powers 17of the Board.18    For the purposes of this item (13), "financial 19institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois Banking 20Act, any savings and loan association subject to the Illinois 21Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any federally chartered 22commercial bank or savings and loan association or 23government-sponsored enterprise organized and operated in this 24State pursuant to the laws of the United States.25(Source: P.A. 96-909, eff. 6-8-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.)   SB1377- 50 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Section 30. The Illinois State University Law is amended 2by changing Section 20-45 as follows: 3    (110 ILCS 675/20-45)4    Sec. 20-45. Powers and duties. The Board also shall have 5power and it shall be its duty:6    (1) To make rules, regulations and bylaws, not 7inconsistent with law, for the government and management of 8Illinois State University and its branches;9    (2) To employ, and, for good cause, to remove a President 10of Illinois State University, and all necessary deans, 11professors, associate professors, assistant professors, 12instructors, other educational and administrative assistants, 13and all other necessary employees, and to prescribe their 14duties and contract with them upon matters relating to tenure, 15salaries and retirement benefits in accordance with the State 16Universities Civil Service Act. Whenever the Board establishes 17a search committee to fill the position of President of 18Illinois State University, there shall be minority 19representation, including women, on that search committee. The 20Board shall, upon the written request of an employee of 21Illinois State University, withhold from the compensation of 22that employee any dues, payments or contributions payable by 23such employee to any labor organization as defined in the 24Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. Under such 25arrangement, an amount shall be withheld from each regular   SB1377- 51 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1payroll period which is equal to the pro rata share of the 2annual dues plus any payments or contributions, and the Board 3shall transmit such withholdings to the specified labor 4organization within 10 working days from the time of the 5withholding;6    (3) To prescribe the courses of study to be followed, and 7textbooks and apparatus to be used at Illinois State 8University;9    (4) To issue upon the recommendation of the faculty, 10diplomas to such persons as have satisfactorily completed the 11required studies of Illinois State University, and confer such 12professional and literary degrees as are usually conferred by 13other institutions of like character for similar or equivalent 14courses of study, or such as the Board may deem appropriate;15    (5) To examine into the conditions, management, and 16administration of Illinois State University, to provide the 17requisite buildings, apparatus, equipment and auxiliary 18enterprises, and to fix and collect matriculation fees; 19tuition fees; fees for student activities; fees for student 20facilities such as student union buildings or field houses or 21stadia or other recreational facilities; student welfare fees; 22laboratory fees; and similar fees for supplies and materials. 23The expense of the building, improving, repairing and 24supplying fuel and furniture and the necessary appliances and 25apparatus for conducting Illinois State University, the 26reimbursed expenses of members of the Board, and the salaries   SB1377- 52 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1or compensation of the President, assistants, agents and other 2employees of Illinois State University, shall be a charge upon 3the State Treasury. All other expenses shall be chargeable 4against students, and the Board shall regulate the charges 5accordingly;6    (6) To succeed to and to administer all trusts, trust 7property, and gifts now or hereafter belonging or pertaining 8to Illinois State University;9    (7) To accept endowments of professorships or departments 10in Illinois State University from any person who may proffer 11them and, at regular meetings, to prescribe rules and 12regulations in relation to endowments and declare on what 13general principles they may be accepted;14    (8) To enter into contracts with the Federal government 15for providing courses of instruction and other services at 16Illinois State University for persons serving in or with the 17military or naval forces of the United States, and to provide 18such courses of instruction and other services;19    (9) To contract with respect to the Cooperative Computer 20Center to obtain services related to electronic data 21processing;22    (10) To provide for the receipt and expenditures of 23Federal funds paid to Illinois State University by the Federal 24government for instruction and other services for persons 25serving in or with the military or naval forces of the United 26States, and to provide for audits of such funds;  SB1377- 53 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    (11) To appoint, subject to the applicable civil service 2law, persons to be members of the Illinois State University 3Police Department. Members of the Police Department shall be 4conservators of the peace and as such have all powers 5possessed by policemen in cities, and sheriffs, including the 6power to make arrests on view or warrants of violations of 7State statutes, University rules and regulations and city or 8county ordinances, except that they may exercise such powers 9only within counties wherein Illinois State University and any 10of its branches or properties are located when such is 11required for the protection of University properties and 12interests, and its students and personnel, and otherwise, 13within such counties, when requested by appropriate State or 14local law enforcement officials. However, such officers shall 15have no power to serve and execute civil processes. The chief 16of police of the Police Department has the final decision on 17all law enforcement decisions. The President and chancellors 18of the University are prohibited from being involved in law 19enforcement decisions. 20    The Board must authorize to each member of the Illinois 21State University Police Department and to any other employee 22of Illinois State University exercising the powers of a peace 23officer a distinct badge that, on its face, (i) clearly states 24that the badge is authorized by Illinois State University and 25(ii) contains a unique identifying number. No other badge 26shall be authorized by Illinois State University;  SB1377- 54 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    (12) The Board may, directly or in cooperation with other 2institutions of higher education, acquire by purchase or lease 3or otherwise, and construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 4complete, operate, control and manage research and high 5technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 6buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 7therefor, to encourage and facilitate (i) the location and 8development of business and industry in the State of Illinois, 9and (ii) the increased application and development of 10technology, and (iii) the improvement and development of the 11State's economy. The Board may lease to nonprofit corporations 12all or any part of the land, buildings, facilities, equipment 13or other property included in a research and high technology 14park upon such terms and conditions as the Board may deem 15advisable and enter into any contract or agreement with such 16nonprofit corporations as may be necessary or suitable for the 17construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 18management of any such park; and may lease to any person, firm, 19partnership or corporation, either public or private, any part 20or all of the land, building, facilities, equipment or other 21property of such park for such purposes and upon such rentals, 22terms and conditions as the Board may deem advisable; and may 23finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including the 24purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, improvement, 25remodeling, addition to, and extension and maintenance of all 26or part of such high technology park, and all equipment and   SB1377- 55 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1furnishings, by legislative appropriations, government grants, 2contracts, private gifts, loans, receipts from the operation 3of such high technology park, rentals and similar receipts; 4and may make its other facilities and services available to 5tenants or other occupants of any such park at rates which are 6reasonable and appropriate;7    (13) To assist in the provision of lands, buildings, and 8facilities that are supportive of university purposes and 9suitable and appropriate for the conduct and operation of the 10university's education programs, the Board of Trustees of 11Illinois State University may exercise the powers specified in 12subparagraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this paragraph (13) with 13regard to the following described property located near the 14Normal, Illinois campus of Illinois State University: 15    Parcel 1: Approximately 300 acres that form a part of the 16    Illinois State University Farm in Section 20, Township 24 17    North, Range 2 East of the Third Principal Meridian in 18    McLean County, Illinois. 19    Parcels 2 and 3: Lands located in the Northeast Quadrant 20    of the City of Normal in McLean County, Illinois, one such 21    parcel consisting of approximately 150 acres located north 22    and east of the old Illinois Soldiers and Sailors 23    Children's School campus, and another such parcel, located 24    in the Northeast Quadrant of the old Soldiers and Sailors 25    Children's School Campus, consisting of approximately 26    1.03.   SB1377- 56 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1        (a) The Board of Trustees may sell, lease, or 2    otherwise transfer and convey all or part of the above 3    described parcels of real estate, together with the 4    improvements situated thereon, to a bona fide purchaser 5    for value, without compliance with the State Property 6    Control Act and on such terms as the Board of Trustees 7    shall determine are in the best interests of Illinois 8    State University and consistent with its objects and 9    purposes. 10        (b) The Board of Trustees may retain the proceeds from 11    the sale, lease, or other transfer of all or any part of 12    the above described parcels of real estate in the 13    University treasury, in a special, separate development 14    fund account that the Auditor General shall examine to 15    assure the use or deposit of those proceeds in a manner 16    consistent with the provisions of subparagraph (c) of this 17    paragraph (13). 18        (c) Moneys from the development fund account may be 19    used by the Board of Trustees of Illinois State University 20    to acquire and develop other land to achieve the same 21    purposes for which the parcels of real estate described in 22    this item (13), all or a part of which have been sold, 23    leased, or otherwise transferred and conveyed, were used 24    and for the purpose of demolition and the processes 25    associated with demolition on the acquired land. Moneys 26    from the development fund account used for any other   SB1377- 57 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    purpose must be deposited into and appropriated from the 2    General Revenue Fund. Buildings or facilities leased to an 3    entity or person other than the University shall not be 4    subject to any limitations applicable to a State-supported 5    college or university under any law. All development on 6    the land and all the use of any buildings or facilities 7    shall be subject to the control and approval of the Board 8    of Trustees of Illinois State University;9    (14) To borrow money, as necessary, from time to time in 10anticipation of receiving tuition, payments from the State of 11Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the University, 12also known as anticipated moneys. The borrowing limit shall be 13capped at 100% of the total amount of payroll and other expense 14vouchers submitted and payable to the University for fiscal 15year 2010 expenses, but unpaid by the State Comptroller's 16office. Prior to borrowing any funds, the University shall 17request from the Comptroller's office a verification of the 18borrowing limit and shall include the estimated date on which 19such borrowing shall occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be 20verified by the State Comptroller's office not prior to 45 21days before any estimated date for executing any promissory 22note or line of credit established under this item (14). The 23principal amount borrowed under a promissory note or line of 24credit shall not exceed 75% of the borrowing limit. Within 15 25days after borrowing funds under any promissory note or line 26of credit established under this item (14), the University   SB1377- 58 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1shall submit to the Governor's Office of Management and 2Budget, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 3Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the President 4of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the Senate an 5Emergency Short Term Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short 6Term Cash Management Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, 7the terms for repayment, the amount of outstanding State 8vouchers as verified by the State Comptroller's office, and 9the University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed funds, 10including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to meet payroll 11obligations to include collective bargaining employees, civil 12service employees, and academic, research, and health care 13personnel. The establishment of any promissory note or line of 14credit established under this item (14) must be finalized 15within 90 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act 16of the 96th General Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be 17applied to the purposes of paying salaries and other expenses 18lawfully authorized in the University's State appropriation 19and unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 20established under this item (14) shall be paid in full one year 21after creation or within 10 days after the date the University 22receives reimbursement from the State for all submitted fiscal 23year 2010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. Any promissory note 24established under this item (14) shall be repaid within one 25year after issuance of the note. The Chairman, Comptroller, or 26Treasurer of the Board shall execute a promissory note or   SB1377- 59 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1similar debt instrument to evidence the indebtedness incurred 2by the borrowing. In connection with a borrowing, the Board 3may establish a line of credit with a financial institution, 4investment bank, or broker/dealer. The obligation to make the 5payments due under any promissory note or line of credit 6established under this item (14) shall be a lawful obligation 7of the University payable from the anticipated moneys. Any 8borrowing under this item (14) shall not constitute a debt, 9legal or moral, of the State and shall not be enforceable 10against the State. The promissory note or line of credit shall 11be authorized by a resolution passed by the Board and shall be 12valid whether or not a budgeted item with respect to that 13resolution is included in any annual or supplemental budget 14adopted by the Board. The resolution shall set forth facts 15demonstrating the need for the borrowing, state an amount that 16the amount to be borrowed will not exceed, and establish a 17maximum interest rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate 18authorized by the Bond Authorization Act or 9%, whichever is 19less. The resolution may direct the Comptroller or Treasurer 20of the Board to make arrangements to set apart and hold the 21portion of the anticipated moneys, as received, that shall be 22used to repay the borrowing, subject to any prior pledges or 23restrictions with respect to the anticipated moneys. The 24resolution may also authorize the Treasurer of the Board to 25make partial repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated 26moneys become available and may contain any other terms,   SB1377- 60 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1restrictions, or limitations not inconsistent with the powers 2of the Board.3    For the purposes of this item (14), "financial 4institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois Banking 5Act, any savings and loan association subject to the Illinois 6Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any federally chartered 7commercial bank or savings and loan association or 8government-sponsored enterprise organized and operated in this 9State pursuant to the laws of the United States.10(Source: P.A. 96-909, eff. 6-8-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 11    Section 35. The Northeastern Illinois University Law is 12amended by changing Section 25-45 as follows: 13    (110 ILCS 680/25-45)14    Sec. 25-45. Powers and duties. The Board also shall have 15power and it shall be its duty:16    (1) To make rules, regulations and bylaws, not 17inconsistent with law, for the government and management of 18Northeastern Illinois University and its branches;19    (2) To employ, and, for good cause, to remove a President 20of Northeastern Illinois University, and all necessary deans, 21professors, associate professors, assistant professors, 22instructors, other educational and administrative assistants, 23and all other necessary employees, and to prescribe their 24duties and contract with them upon matters relating to tenure,   SB1377- 61 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1salaries and retirement benefits in accordance with the State 2Universities Civil Service Act. Whenever the Board establishes 3a search committee to fill the position of President of 4Northeastern Illinois University, there shall be minority 5representation, including women, on that search committee. The 6Board shall, upon the written request of an employee of 7Northeastern Illinois University, withhold from the 8compensation of that employee any dues, payments or 9contributions payable by such employee to any labor 10organization as defined in the Illinois Educational Labor 11Relations Act. Under such arrangement, an amount shall be 12withheld from each regular payroll period which is equal to 13the pro rata share of the annual dues plus any payments or 14contributions, and the Board shall transmit such withholdings 15to the specified labor organization within 10 working days 16from the time of the withholding;17    (3) To prescribe the courses of study to be followed, and 18textbooks and apparatus to be used at Northeastern Illinois 19University;20    (4) To issue upon the recommendation of the faculty, 21diplomas to such persons as have satisfactorily completed the 22required studies of Northeastern Illinois University, and 23confer such professional and literary degrees as are usually 24conferred by other institutions of like character for similar 25or equivalent courses of study, or such as the Board may deem 26appropriate;  SB1377- 62 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    (5) To examine into the conditions, management, and 2administration of Northeastern Illinois University, to provide 3the requisite buildings, apparatus, equipment and auxiliary 4enterprises, and to fix and collect matriculation fees; 5tuition fees; fees for student activities; fees for student 6facilities such as student union buildings or field houses or 7stadia or other recreational facilities; student welfare fees; 8laboratory fees; and similar fees for supplies and materials. 9The expense of the building, improving, repairing and 10supplying fuel and furniture and the necessary appliances and 11apparatus for conducting Northeastern Illinois University, the 12reimbursed expenses of members of the Board, and the salaries 13or compensation of the President, assistants, agents and other 14employees of Northeastern Illinois University, shall be a 15charge upon the State Treasury. All other expenses shall be 16chargeable against students, and the Board shall regulate the 17charges accordingly;18    (6) To succeed to and to administer all trusts, trust 19property, and gifts now or hereafter belonging or pertaining 20to Northeastern Illinois University;21    (7) To accept endowments of professorships or departments 22in Northeastern Illinois University from any person who may 23proffer them and, at regular meetings, to prescribe rules and 24regulations in relation to endowments and declare on what 25general principles they may be accepted;26    (8) To enter into contracts with the Federal government   SB1377- 63 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1for providing courses of instruction and other services at 2Northeastern Illinois University for persons serving in or 3with the military or naval forces of the United States, and to 4provide such courses of instruction and other services;5    (9) To contract with respect to the Cooperative Computer 6Center to obtain services related to electronic data 7processing;8    (10) To provide for the receipt and expenditures of 9Federal funds paid to Northeastern Illinois University by the 10Federal government for instruction and other services for 11persons serving in or with the military or naval forces of the 12United States, and to provide for audits of such funds;13    (11) To appoint, subject to the applicable civil service 14law, persons to be members of the Northeastern Illinois 15University Police Department. Members of the Police Department 16shall be conservators of the peace and as such have all powers 17possessed by policemen in cities, and sheriffs, including the 18power to make arrests on view or warrants of violations of 19State statutes, University rules and regulations and city or 20county ordinances, except that they may exercise such powers 21only within counties wherein Northeastern Illinois University 22and any of its branches or properties are located when such is 23required for the protection of University properties and 24interests, and its students and personnel, and otherwise, 25within such counties, when requested by appropriate State or 26local law enforcement officials. However, such officers shall   SB1377- 64 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1have no power to serve and execute civil processes. The chief 2of police of the Police Department has the final decision on 3all law enforcement decisions. The President and chancellors 4of the University are prohibited from being involved in law 5enforcement decisions. 6    The Board must authorize to each member of the 7Northeastern Illinois University Police Department and to any 8other employee of Northeastern Illinois University exercising 9the powers of a peace officer a distinct badge that, on its 10face, (i) clearly states that the badge is authorized by 11Northeastern Illinois University and (ii) contains a unique 12identifying number. No other badge shall be authorized by 13Northeastern Illinois University;14    (12) The Board may, directly or in cooperation with other 15institutions of higher education, acquire by purchase or lease 16or otherwise, and construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 17complete, operate, control and manage research and high 18technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 19buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 20therefor, to encourage and facilitate (i) the location and 21development of business and industry in the State of Illinois, 22and (ii) the increased application and development of 23technology, and (iii) the improvement and development of the 24State's economy. The Board may lease to nonprofit corporations 25all or any part of the land, buildings, facilities, equipment 26or other property included in a research and high technology   SB1377- 65 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1park upon such terms and conditions as the Board may deem 2advisable and enter into any contract or agreement with such 3nonprofit corporations as may be necessary or suitable for the 4construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 5management of any such park; and may lease to any person, firm, 6partnership or corporation, either public or private, any part 7or all of the land, building, facilities, equipment or other 8property of such park for such purposes and upon such rentals, 9terms and conditions as the Board may deem advisable; and may 10finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including the 11purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, improvement, 12remodeling, addition to, and extension and maintenance of all 13or part of such high technology park, and all equipment and 14furnishings, by legislative appropriations, government grants, 15contracts, private gifts, loans, receipts from the operation 16of such high technology park, rentals and similar receipts; 17and may make its other facilities and services available to 18tenants or other occupants of any such park at rates which are 19reasonable and appropriate;20    (13) To borrow money, as necessary, from time to time in 21anticipation of receiving tuition, payments from the State of 22Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the University, 23also known as anticipated moneys. The borrowing limit shall be 24capped at 100% of the total amount of payroll and other expense 25vouchers submitted and payable to the University for fiscal 26year 2010 expenses, but unpaid by the State Comptroller's   SB1377- 66 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1office. Prior to borrowing any funds, the University shall 2request from the Comptroller's office a verification of the 3borrowing limit and shall include the estimated date on which 4such borrowing shall occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be 5verified by the State Comptroller's office not prior to 45 6days before any estimated date for executing any promissory 7note or line of credit established under this item (13). The 8principal amount borrowed under a promissory note or line of 9credit shall not exceed 75% of the borrowing limit. Within 15 10days after borrowing funds under any promissory note or line 11of credit established under this item (13), the University 12shall submit to the Governor's Office of Management and 13Budget, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 14Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the President 15of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the Senate an 16Emergency Short Term Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short 17Term Cash Management Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, 18the terms for repayment, the amount of outstanding State 19vouchers as verified by the State Comptroller's office, and 20the University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed funds, 21including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to meet payroll 22obligations to include collective bargaining employees, civil 23service employees, and academic, research, and health care 24personnel. The establishment of any promissory note or line of 25credit established under this item (13) must be finalized 26within 90 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act   SB1377- 67 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1of the 96th General Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be 2applied to the purposes of paying salaries and other expenses 3lawfully authorized in the University's State appropriation 4and unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 5established under this item (13) shall be paid in full one year 6after creation or within 10 days after the date the University 7receives reimbursement from the State for all submitted fiscal 8year 2010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. Any promissory note 9established under this item (13) shall be repaid within one 10year after issuance of the note. The Chairman, Comptroller, or 11Treasurer of the Board shall execute a promissory note or 12similar debt instrument to evidence the indebtedness incurred 13by the borrowing. In connection with a borrowing, the Board 14may establish a line of credit with a financial institution, 15investment bank, or broker/dealer. The obligation to make the 16payments due under any promissory note or line of credit 17established under this item (13) shall be a lawful obligation 18of the University payable from the anticipated moneys. Any 19borrowing under this item (13) shall not constitute a debt, 20legal or moral, of the State and shall not be enforceable 21against the State. The promissory note or line of credit shall 22be authorized by a resolution passed by the Board and shall be 23valid whether or not a budgeted item with respect to that 24resolution is included in any annual or supplemental budget 25adopted by the Board. The resolution shall set forth facts 26demonstrating the need for the borrowing, state an amount that   SB1377- 68 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1the amount to be borrowed will not exceed, and establish a 2maximum interest rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate 3authorized by the Bond Authorization Act or 9%, whichever is 4less. The resolution may direct the Comptroller or Treasurer 5of the Board to make arrangements to set apart and hold the 6portion of the anticipated moneys, as received, that shall be 7used to repay the borrowing, subject to any prior pledges or 8restrictions with respect to the anticipated moneys. The 9resolution may also authorize the Treasurer of the Board to 10make partial repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated 11moneys become available and may contain any other terms, 12restrictions, or limitations not inconsistent with the powers 13of the Board.14    For the purposes of this item (13), "financial 15institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois Banking 16Act, any savings and loan association subject to the Illinois 17Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any federally chartered 18commercial bank or savings and loan association or 19government-sponsored enterprise organized and operated in this 20State pursuant to the laws of the United States.21(Source: P.A. 96-909, eff. 6-8-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 22    Section 40. The Northern Illinois University Law is 23amended by changing Section 30-45 as follows: 24    (110 ILCS 685/30-45)  SB1377- 69 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Sec. 30-45. Powers and duties. The Board also shall have 2power and it shall be its duty:3    (1) To make rules, regulations and bylaws, not 4inconsistent with law, for the government and management of 5Northern Illinois University and its branches.6    (2) To employ, and, for good cause, to remove a President 7of Northern Illinois University, and all necessary deans, 8professors, associate professors, assistant professors, 9instructors, other educational and administrative assistants, 10and all other necessary employees, and to prescribe their 11duties and contract with them upon matters relating to tenure, 12salaries and retirement benefits in accordance with the State 13Universities Civil Service Act. Whenever the Board establishes 14a search committee to fill the position of President of 15Northern Illinois University, there shall be minority 16representation, including women, on that search committee. The 17Board shall, upon the written request of an employee of 18Northern Illinois University, withhold from the compensation 19of that employee any dues, payments or contributions payable 20by such employee to any labor organization as defined in the 21Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. Under such 22arrangement, an amount shall be withheld from each regular 23payroll period which is equal to the pro rata share of the 24annual dues plus any payments or contributions, and the Board 25shall transmit such withholdings to the specified labor 26organization within 10 working days from the time of the   SB1377- 70 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1withholding.2    (3) To prescribe the courses of study to be followed, and 3textbooks and apparatus to be used at Northern Illinois 4University.5    (4) To issue upon the recommendation of the faculty, 6diplomas to such persons as have satisfactorily completed the 7required studies of Northern Illinois University, and confer 8such professional and literary degrees as are usually 9conferred by other institutions of like character for similar 10or equivalent courses of study, or such as the Board may deem 11appropriate.12    (5) To examine into the conditions, management, and 13administration of Northern Illinois University, to provide the 14requisite buildings, apparatus, equipment and auxiliary 15enterprises, and to fix and collect matriculation fees; 16tuition fees; fees for student activities; fees for student 17facilities such as student union buildings or field houses or 18stadia or other recreational facilities; student welfare fees; 19laboratory fees; and similar fees for supplies and materials. 20The expense of the building, improving, repairing and 21supplying fuel and furniture and the necessary appliances and 22apparatus for conducting Northern Illinois University, the 23reimbursed expenses of members of the Board, and the salaries 24or compensation of the President, assistants, agents and other 25employees of Northern Illinois University, shall be a charge 26upon the State Treasury. All other expenses shall be   SB1377- 71 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1chargeable against students, and the Board shall regulate the 2charges accordingly.3    (6) To succeed to and to administer all trusts, trust 4property, and gifts now or hereafter belonging or pertaining 5to Northern Illinois University.6    (7) To accept endowments of professorships or departments 7in Northern Illinois University from any person who may 8proffer them and, at regular meetings, to prescribe rules and 9regulations in relation to endowments and declare on what 10general principles they may be accepted.11    (8) To enter into contracts with the Federal government 12for providing courses of instruction and other services at 13Northern Illinois University for persons serving in or with 14the military or naval forces of the United States, and to 15provide such courses of instruction and other services.16    (9) To contract with respect to the Cooperative Computer 17Center to obtain services related to electronic data 18processing.19    (10) To provide for the receipt and expenditures of 20Federal funds paid to Northern Illinois University by the 21Federal government for instruction and other services for 22persons serving in or with the military or naval forces of the 23United States, and to provide for audits of such funds.24    (11) To appoint, subject to the applicable civil service 25law, persons to be members of the Northern Illinois University 26Police Department. Members of the Police Department shall be   SB1377- 72 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1conservators of the peace and as such have all powers 2possessed by policemen in cities, and sheriffs, including the 3power to make arrests on view or warrants of violations of 4State statutes, University rules and regulations and city or 5county ordinances, except that they may exercise such powers 6only within counties wherein Northern Illinois University and 7any of its branches or properties are located when such is 8required for the protection of University properties and 9interests, and its students and personnel, and otherwise, 10within such counties, when requested by appropriate State or 11local law enforcement officials. However, such officers shall 12have no power to serve and execute civil processes. The chief 13of police of the Police Department has the final decision on 14all law enforcement decisions. The President and chancellors 15of the University are prohibited from being involved in law 16enforcement decisions. 17    The Board must authorize to each member of the Northern 18Illinois University Police Department and to any other 19employee of Northern Illinois University exercising the powers 20of a peace officer a distinct badge that, on its face, (i) 21clearly states that the badge is authorized by Northern 22Illinois University and (ii) contains a unique identifying 23number. No other badge shall be authorized by Northern 24Illinois University.25    (12) The Board may, directly or in cooperation with other 26institutions of higher education, acquire by purchase or lease   SB1377- 73 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1or otherwise, and construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 2complete, operate, control and manage research and high 3technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 4buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 5therefor, to encourage and facilitate (i) the location and 6development of business and industry in the State of Illinois, 7and (ii) the increased application and development of 8technology, and (iii) the improvement and development of the 9State's economy. The Board may lease to nonprofit corporations 10all or any part of the land, buildings, facilities, equipment 11or other property included in a research and high technology 12park upon such terms and conditions as the Board may deem 13advisable and enter into any contract or agreement with such 14nonprofit corporations as may be necessary or suitable for the 15construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 16management of any such park; and may lease to any person, firm, 17partnership or corporation, either public or private, any part 18or all of the land, building, facilities, equipment or other 19property of such park for such purposes and upon such rentals, 20terms and conditions as the Board may deem advisable; and may 21finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including the 22purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, improvement, 23remodeling, addition to, and extension and maintenance of all 24or part of such high technology park, and all equipment and 25furnishings, by legislative appropriations, government grants, 26contracts, private gifts, loans, receipts from the operation   SB1377- 74 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1of such high technology park, rentals and similar receipts; 2and may make its other facilities and services available to 3tenants or other occupants of any such park at rates which are 4reasonable and appropriate.5    (13) To assist in the provision of buildings and 6facilities beneficial to, useful for, or supportive of 7university purposes, the Board of Trustees of Northern 8Illinois University may exercise the following powers with 9regard to the areas bounded as follows:10Parcel 1: 11    In Township 40 North, Range 4 East, of the Third Prime 12    Meridian, County of DeKalb, State of Illinois: The East 13    half of the Southeast Quarter of Section 17, the Southwest 14    Quarter of Section 16, and the Northwest Quarter of 15    Section 21, all in the County of DeKalb, Illinois.16Parcel 2: 17    In Township 40 North, Range 4 East, of the Third Prime 18    Meridian, County of DeKalb, State of Illinois: On the 19    North, by a line beginning at the Northwest corner of the 20    Southeast Quarter of Section 15; thence East 1,903.3 feet; 21    thence South to the North line of the Southeast Quarter of 22    the Southeast Quarter of Section 15; thence East along 23    said line to North First Street; on the West by Garden Road 24    between Lucinda Avenue and the North boundary; thence on 25    the South by Lucinda Avenue between Garden Road and the 26    intersection of Lucinda Avenue and the South Branch of the   SB1377- 75 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Kishwaukee River, and by the South Branch of the 2    Kishwaukee River between such intersection and easterly to 3    the intersection of such river and North First Street; 4    thence on the East by North First Street.5Parcel 3: 6    That Part of Lot 4 in the Sears Business Park Subdivison, 7    being a subdivison of part of the East 1/2 of Section 31, 8    and that part of Section 32, and that part of the West 1/2 9    of Section 33, all in Township 42 North, Range 9, East of 10    the Third Principal Meridian and also that part of 11    fractional section 3, and fractional section 4, both in 12    Township 41 North, Range 9, East of the Third Principal 13    Meridian according to the plat thereof recorded March 7, 14    1991 as Document no. 91103116, in Cook County, Illinois, 15    More particularly described as follows: Commencing at the 16    Northwest corner of the northwest 1/4 of the southwest 1/4 17    of said section 32; thence south 89 ° 40' 15" East along 18    the North line of the Northwest 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4 of 19    said section 32, a distance of 164.57 feet to a point 20    thence South 0° 19' 45" West, a distance of 326.21 feet to 21    the Southerly right-of-way line boulevard "A" being also 22    point of beginning : Thence South 76°44'08" East, a 23    distance of 84.61 feet to a point of curvature: thence 24    southeasterly 267.01 feet along the arc of a circle, 25    convex to the southeast, having a radius of 3,550.00 feet 26    and whose chord of 266.95 feet bears South 78° 53'07" East   SB1377- 76 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    to a point; thence South 32°22'21" East, a distance of 2    374.66 feet to a point; thence South 73°35'18" west, a 3    distance of 89.48 feet to a point; thence North 74°09'49" 4    west, a distance of 97.37 feet to a point; thence South 5    74°56'20" West, a distance of 103.60 feet to a point; 6    thence South 57°44'26" West, a distance of 150.18 feet to 7    a point; thence North 32°22'20" West, a distance of 346.61 8    feet; thence North 13°15'53" East, a distance of 205.84 9    feet to the point of beginning; Containing 169,817.1 sq. 10    ft. or 3.8985 acres, more or less, all in Cook County, 11    Illinois. 12Parcel 4: 13    Part of Section Twenty-four (24), Township Forty-four (44) 14    North, Range Two (2) East of the Third (3rd) Principal 15    Meridian, bounded and described as follows, to-wit: 16    Commencing at the Northwest corner of the East Half of the 17    Northwest Quarter of said Section; thence South 18    00°-34'-13" West, along the West line of the East Half of 19    the Northwest Quarter of said Section, 2,646.48 feet to 20    its intersection with the Southwest corner of the East 21    Half of the Northwest Quarter of said Section; thence 22    South 00°-32'-41" West, along the West line of the East 23    Half of the Southwest Quarter of said Section, 1,141.57 24    feet to its intersection with the North Right-of-Way line 25    for U.S. Route 20 as now laid out and used; thence North 26    80°-25'-35" East, along said North Right-of-Way line,   SB1377- 77 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    1,303.19 feet; thence North 74°-42'-57" East, along said 2    North Right-of-Way line, (100.50 feet; thence North 3    80°-25'-35" East, along said North Right-of-Way line.) 4    116.08 feet to the point of beginning for the following 5    described parcel; thence North 09°-34'- 25" West, 533.87 6    feet; thence Northeasterly, along a circular curve to the 7    left having a radius of 1,530.00 feet and whose center 8    lies to the North, an arc distance of 372.12 feet(the 9    chord across the last described circular curve course 10    bears North 76°-09'-26" East, 371.21 feet); thence 11    Northeasterly, along a circular curve to the right having 12    a radius of 1,470.00 feet and whose center lies to the 13    South, an arc distance of 227.59 feet (the chord across 14    the last described circular curve course bears North 15    73°-37'-29" East, 227.36 feet); thence Northeasterly, 16    along a circular curve to the left having a radius of 17    530.00 feet and whose center lies to the North, an arc 18    distance of 156.42 feet (the chord across the last 19    described circular curve course bears North 69°-36'-19" 20    East, 155.85 feet); thence South 11°-49'-08" East, 643.18 21    feet to its intersection with said North Right-of-Way line 22    for U.S. Route 20; thence South 80°-25'-35" West, along 23    said North Right-of-Way line, 190.29 feet; thence North 24    85°-32'-15" West, along said North Right-of-Way line, 25    103.08 feet; thence South 80°-25'-35" West, along said 26    North Right-of-Way line, 483.92 feet to the point of   SB1377- 78 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    beginning. Subject to the rights of the public and the 2    State of Illinois in and to those portions thereof taken, 3    used or dedicated for public road purposes. Situated in 4    the City of Rockford, the County of Winnebago and the 5    State of Illinois. 6Parcel 5: 7    Lot 1 in Washington Commons Assessment Plat of Part of the 8    South 1/2 of Section 6, Township 38 North, Range 10, East 9    of the Third Principal, Meridian, according to the plat 10    thereof recorded October 21, 1996 as Document R96-172065, 11    in DuPage County, Illinois. 12Parcel 6: 13    That part of Lots A and B of the C. M. Cheatham 14    subdivision, a Resubdivision of part of assessor's Lot 58 15    in Section 12, Township 40 North, Range 4, East of the 16    Third Principal Meridian, DeKalb County, Illinois, 17    described as follows: Commencing at the Southeast corner 18    of said Lot "A" (said corner being a point on the 19    Southeasterly line of said subdivision, said line being 20    labeled on the plat of said subdivision, the centerline of 21    Sycamore Road before relocation); Thence Northwesterly 22    along the South line of said Lot "A" 293.0 feet for a point 23    of beginning; thence Northwesterly along said south line, 24    253.54 feet to a point 60.36 feet Southeasterly of, as 25    measured along said South line, the most northerly corner 26    of said Lot "B"; thence westerly 53.38 feet to a point on   SB1377- 79 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    the west line of said Lot "B" that is 17.71 feet Southerly 2    of, as measured along said west line, the most Northerly 3    corner of said Lot B; thence Northeasterly along said west 4    line, 17.71 feet to the Southwest corner of said Lot "A"; 5    thence Northeasterly along the west line of said Lot "A", 6    151.2 feet to the Northwest corner of said Lot "A"; thence 7    Southeasterly along the north line of said Lot "A", 414.9 8    feet to an angle point in said North line; thence 9    Southeasterly along said North line, 299.3 feet to said 10    Southeasterly line of said subdivision; thence 11    Southwesterly along said Southeasterly line, 15.4 feet; 12    thence Northwesterly parallel with said North line, 290.0 13    feet; thence Southwesterly, 252.85 feet to the point of 14    beginning. 15Parcel 7: 16    Lot 10 and the East Half of Lot 9 in Woodlawn Acres, a 17    subdivision of a part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 18    14,Township 40 North, Range 4 East of the Third Principal 19    Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded June 20    28th, 1948, as Document No. 213915, in Plat Book "G", Page 21    140, in DeKalb County, Illinois.22Parcel 8:23    That part of the vacated public alley which lies 24    Northeasterly of the Southwesterly line of Lot 11 of said 25    Woodlawn Acres extended Northwesterly to the Southeasterly 26    line of Lot 9.  SB1377- 80 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1Parcel 9:2    Lot 11 in Woodlawn Acres, a subdivision of a part of the 3    Southeast Quarter of Section 14, Township 40 North, Range 4    4 East of the Third Principal Meridian, according to the 5    plat thereof recorded June 28th, 1948, as Document No. 6    213915, in Plat Book "G", Page 140, in DeKalb County, 7    Illinois.8Parcel 10:9    That Part Of Lot 1002 Of The Anaconda Wire And Cable 10    Company Resubdivision Of part of Sections 29 And 32, 11    Township 41 North, Range 5, East of the Third Principal 12    Meridian, DeKalb County, Illinois, Described as follows: 13    Commencing at the Southeast Corner of said Lot 1002; 14    Thence Northerly along the Easterly Line of said Lot, 15    728.49 Feet for a point of beginning; Thence continuing 16    Northerly along said Easterly Line, 180.00 Feet; Thence 17    Westerly at an angle of 93 Degrees 24 Minutes 33 Seconds 18    measured clockwise from said West line, 1,596.83 Feet to a 19    point on the West line of said Section 29 that is 863.41 20    Feet Northerly of, as measured along said West Line, the 21    Southwest Corner of said Section 29; Thence Southerly at 22    an angle Of 79 Degrees 54 Minutes 40 Seconds measured 23    clockwise from the last described course along said West 24    line, 365.65 Feet; Thence Southeasterly at an angle of 100 25    Degrees 05 Minutes 20 Seconds measured clockwise from said 26    West line, 1,080.00 Feet; Thence Northeasterly at Right   SB1377- 81 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Angles to the last described course, 150.00 Feet; Thence 2    Southeasterly at an angle of 93 Degrees 44 Minutes 48 3    Seconds measured counterclockwise from the last described 4    course, 463.97 Feet to the point of beginning, all in 5    Sycamore Township, DeKalb County, Illinois. 6        (a) Acquire any interests in land, buildings, or 7    facilities by purchase, including installments payable 8    over a period allowed by law, by lease over a term of such 9    duration as the Board of Trustees shall determine, or by 10    exercise of the power of eminent domain; 11        (b) Sublease or contract to purchase through 12    installments all or any portion of buildings or facilities 13    for such duration and on such terms as the Board of 14    Trustees shall determine, including a term that exceeds 5 15    years, provided that each such lease or purchase contract 16    shall be and shall recite that it is subject to 17    termination and cancellation in any year for which the 18    General Assembly fails to make an appropriation to pay the 19    rent or purchase installments payable under the terms of 20    such lease or purchase contracts; and 21        (c) Sell property without compliance with the State 22    Property Control Act and retain proceeds in the University 23    treasury in a special, separate development fund account 24    which the Auditor General shall examine to assure 25    compliance with this Act.26    Any buildings or facilities to be developed on the land   SB1377- 82 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1shall be buildings or facilities that, in the determination of 2the Board of Trustees, in whole or in part: (i) are for use by 3the University; or (ii) otherwise advance the interests of the 4University, including, by way of example, residential, 5recreational, educational, and athletic facilities for 6University staff and students and commercial facilities which 7provide services needed by the University community. Revenues 8from the development fund account may be withdrawn by the 9University for the purpose of demolition and the processes 10associated with demolition; repairs to existing campus 11facilities and infrastructure, and professional services 12associated with planning and design. Moneys from the 13development fund account used for any other purpose must be 14deposited into and appropriated from the General Revenue Fund. 15Buildings or facilities leased to an entity or person other 16than the University shall not be subject to any limitations 17applicable to a State-supported college or university under 18any law. All development on the land and all the use of any 19buildings or facilities shall be subject to the control and 20approval of the Board of Trustees of Northern Illinois 21University.22    (14) To borrow money, as necessary, from time to time in 23anticipation of receiving tuition, payments from the State of 24Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the University, 25also known as anticipated moneys. The borrowing limit shall be 26capped at 100% of the total amount of payroll and other expense   SB1377- 83 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1vouchers submitted and payable to the University for fiscal 2year 2010 expenses, but unpaid by the State Comptroller's 3office. Prior to borrowing any funds, the University shall 4request from the Comptroller's office a verification of the 5borrowing limit and shall include the estimated date on which 6such borrowing shall occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be 7verified by the State Comptroller's office not prior to 45 8days before any estimated date for executing any promissory 9note or line of credit established under this item (14). The 10principal amount borrowed under a promissory note or line of 11credit shall not exceed 75% of the borrowing limit. Within 15 12days after borrowing funds under any promissory note or line 13of credit established under this item (14), the University 14shall submit to the Governor's Office of Management and 15Budget, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 16Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the President 17of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the Senate an 18Emergency Short Term Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short 19Term Cash Management Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, 20the terms for repayment, the amount of outstanding State 21vouchers as verified by the State Comptroller's office, and 22the University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed funds, 23including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to meet payroll 24obligations for all collective bargaining employees, civil 25service employees, and academic, research, and health care 26personnel. The establishment of any promissory note or line of   SB1377- 84 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1credit established under this item (14) must be finalized 2within 90 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act 3of the 96th General Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be 4applied to the purposes of paying salaries and other expenses 5lawfully authorized in the University's State appropriation 6and unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 7established under this item (14) shall be paid in full one year 8after creation or within 10 days after the date the University 9receives reimbursement from the State for all submitted fiscal 10year 2010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. Any promissory note 11established under this item (14) shall be repaid within one 12year after issuance of the note. The Chairman, Comptroller, or 13Treasurer of the Board shall execute a promissory note or 14similar debt instrument to evidence the indebtedness incurred 15by the borrowing. In connection with a borrowing, the Board 16may establish a line of credit with a financial institution, 17investment bank, or broker/dealer. The obligation to make the 18payments due under any promissory note or line of credit 19established under this item (14) shall be a lawful obligation 20of the University payable from the anticipated moneys. Any 21borrowing under this item (14) shall not constitute a debt, 22legal or moral, of the State and shall not be enforceable 23against the State. The promissory note or line of credit shall 24be authorized by a resolution passed by the Board and shall be 25valid whether or not a budgeted item with respect to that 26resolution is included in any annual or supplemental budget   SB1377- 85 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1adopted by the Board. The resolution shall set forth facts 2demonstrating the need for the borrowing, state an amount that 3the amount to be borrowed will not exceed, and establish a 4maximum interest rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate 5authorized by the Bond Authorization Act or 9%, whichever is 6less. The resolution may direct the Comptroller or Treasurer 7of the Board to make arrangements to set apart and hold the 8portion of the anticipated moneys, as received, that shall be 9used to repay the borrowing, subject to any prior pledges or 10restrictions with respect to the anticipated moneys. The 11resolution may also authorize the Treasurer of the Board to 12make partial repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated 13moneys become available and may contain any other terms, 14restrictions, or limitations not inconsistent with the powers 15of the Board.16    For the purposes of this item (14), "financial 17institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois Banking 18Act, any savings and loan association subject to the Illinois 19Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any federally chartered 20commercial bank or savings and loan association or 21government-sponsored enterprise organized and operated in this 22State pursuant to the laws of the United States.23(Source: P.A. 101-665, eff. 4-2-21.) 24    Section 45. The Western Illinois University Law is amended 25by changing Section 35-45 as follows:   SB1377- 86 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    (110 ILCS 690/35-45)2    Sec. 35-45. Powers and duties. The Board also shall have 3power and it shall be its duty:4    (1) To make rules, regulations and bylaws, not 5inconsistent with law, for the government and management of 6Western Illinois University and its branches;7    (2) To employ, and, for good cause, to remove a President 8of Western Illinois University, and all necessary deans, 9professors, associate professors, assistant professors, 10instructors, other educational and administrative assistants, 11and all other necessary employees, and to prescribe their 12duties and contract with them upon matters relating to tenure, 13salaries and retirement benefits in accordance with the State 14Universities Civil Service Act. Whenever the Board establishes 15a search committee to fill the position of President of 16Western Illinois University, there shall be minority 17representation, including women, on that search committee. The 18Board shall, upon the written request of an employee of 19Western Illinois University, withhold from the compensation of 20that employee any dues, payments or contributions payable by 21such employee to any labor organization as defined in the 22Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. Under such 23arrangement, an amount shall be withheld from each regular 24payroll period which is equal to the pro rata share of the 25annual dues plus any payments or contributions, and the Board   SB1377- 87 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1shall transmit such withholdings to the specified labor 2organization within 10 working days from the time of the 3withholding;4    (3) To prescribe the courses of study to be followed, and 5textbooks and apparatus to be used at Western Illinois 6University;7    (4) To issue upon the recommendation of the faculty, 8diplomas to such persons as have satisfactorily completed the 9required studies of Western Illinois University, and confer 10such professional and literary degrees as are usually 11conferred by other institutions of like character for similar 12or equivalent courses of study, or such as the Board may deem 13appropriate;14    (5) To examine into the conditions, management, and 15administration of Western Illinois University, to provide the 16requisite buildings, apparatus, equipment and auxiliary 17enterprises, and to fix and collect matriculation fees; 18tuition fees; fees for student activities; fees for student 19facilities such as student union buildings or field houses or 20stadia or other recreational facilities; student welfare fees; 21laboratory fees; and similar fees for supplies and materials. 22The expense of the building, improving, repairing and 23supplying fuel and furniture and the necessary appliances and 24apparatus for conducting Western Illinois University, the 25reimbursed expenses of members of the Board, and the salaries 26or compensation of the President, assistants, agents and other   SB1377- 88 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1employees of Western Illinois University, shall be a charge 2upon the State Treasury. All other expenses shall be 3chargeable against students, and the Board shall regulate the 4charges accordingly;5    (6) To succeed to and to administer all trusts, trust 6property, and gifts now or hereafter belonging or pertaining 7to Western Illinois University;8    (7) To accept endowments of professorships or departments 9in Western Illinois University from any person who may proffer 10them and, at regular meetings, to prescribe rules and 11regulations in relation to endowments and declare on what 12general principles they may be accepted;13    (8) To enter into contracts with the Federal government 14for providing courses of instruction and other services at 15Western Illinois University for persons serving in or with the 16military or naval forces of the United States, and to provide 17such courses of instruction and other services;18    (9) To contract with respect to the Cooperative Computer 19Center to obtain services related to electronic data 20processing;21    (10) To provide for the receipt and expenditures of 22Federal funds paid to Western Illinois University by the 23Federal government for instruction and other services for 24persons serving in or with the military or naval forces of the 25United States, and to provide for audits of such funds;26    (11) To appoint, subject to the applicable civil service   SB1377- 89 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1law, persons to be members of the Western Illinois University 2Police Department. Members of the Police Department shall be 3conservators of the peace and as such have all powers 4possessed by policemen in cities, and sheriffs, including the 5power to make arrests on view or warrants of violations of 6State statutes, University rules and regulations and city or 7county ordinances, except that they may exercise such powers 8only within counties wherein Western Illinois University and 9any of its branches or properties are located when such is 10required for the protection of University properties and 11interests, and its students and personnel, and otherwise, 12within such counties, when requested by appropriate State or 13local law enforcement officials. However, such officers shall 14have no power to serve and execute civil processes. The chief 15of police of the Police Department has the final decision on 16all law enforcement decisions. The President and chancellors 17of the University are prohibited from being involved in law 18enforcement decisions. 19    The Board must authorize to each member of the Western 20Illinois University Police Department and to any other 21employee of Western Illinois University exercising the powers 22of a peace officer a distinct badge that, on its face, (i) 23clearly states that the badge is authorized by Western 24Illinois University and (ii) contains a unique identifying 25number. No other badge shall be authorized by Western Illinois 26University;  SB1377- 90 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    (12) The Board may, directly or in cooperation with other 2institutions of higher education, acquire by purchase or lease 3or otherwise, and construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 4complete, operate, control and manage research and high 5technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 6buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 7therefor, to encourage and facilitate (i) the location and 8development of business and industry in the State of Illinois, 9and (ii) the increased application and development of 10technology, and (iii) the improvement and development of the 11State's economy. The Board may lease to nonprofit corporations 12all or any part of the land, buildings, facilities, equipment 13or other property included in a research and high technology 14park upon such terms and conditions as the Board may deem 15advisable and enter into any contract or agreement with such 16nonprofit corporations as may be necessary or suitable for the 17construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 18management of any such park; and may lease to any person, firm, 19partnership or corporation, either public or private, any part 20or all of the land, building, facilities, equipment or other 21property of such park for such purposes and upon such rentals, 22terms and conditions as the Board may deem advisable; and may 23finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including the 24purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, improvement, 25remodeling, addition to, and extension and maintenance of all 26or part of such high technology park, and all equipment and   SB1377- 91 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1furnishings, by legislative appropriations, government grants, 2contracts, private gifts, loans, receipts from the operation 3of such high technology park, rentals and similar receipts; 4and may make its other facilities and services available to 5tenants or other occupants of any such park at rates which are 6reasonable and appropriate;7    (13) To borrow money, as necessary, from time to time in 8anticipation of receiving tuition, payments from the State of 9Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the University, 10also known as anticipated moneys. The borrowing limit shall be 11capped at 100% of the total amount of payroll and other expense 12vouchers submitted and payable to the University for fiscal 13year 2010 expenses, but unpaid by the State Comptroller's 14office. Prior to borrowing any funds, the University shall 15request from the Comptroller's office a verification of the 16borrowing limit and shall include the estimated date on which 17such borrowing shall occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be 18verified by the State Comptroller's office not prior to 45 19days before any estimated date for executing any promissory 20note or line of credit established under this item (13). The 21principal amount borrowed under a promissory note or line of 22credit shall not exceed 75% of the borrowing limit. Within 15 23days after borrowing funds under any promissory note or line 24of credit established under this item (13), the University 25shall submit to the Governor's Office of Management and 26Budget, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the   SB1377- 92 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the President 2of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the Senate an 3Emergency Short Term Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short 4Term Cash Management Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, 5the terms for repayment, the amount of outstanding State 6vouchers as verified by the State Comptroller's office, and 7the University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed funds, 8including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to meet payroll 9obligations to include collective bargaining employees, civil 10service employees, and academic, research, and health care 11personnel. The establishment of any promissory note or line of 12credit established under this item (13) must be finalized 13within 90 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act 14of the 96th General Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be 15applied to the purposes of paying salaries and other expenses 16lawfully authorized in the University's State appropriation 17and unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 18established under this item (13) shall be paid in full one year 19after creation or within 10 days after the date the University 20receives reimbursement from the State for all submitted fiscal 21year 2010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. Any promissory note 22established under this item (13) shall be repaid within one 23year after issuance of the note. The Chairman, Comptroller, or 24Treasurer of the Board shall execute a promissory note or 25similar debt instrument to evidence the indebtedness incurred 26by the borrowing. In connection with a borrowing, the Board   SB1377- 93 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1may establish a line of credit with a financial institution, 2investment bank, or broker/dealer. The obligation to make the 3payments due under any promissory note or line of credit 4established under this item (13) shall be a lawful obligation 5of the University payable from the anticipated moneys. Any 6borrowing under this item (13) shall not constitute a debt, 7legal or moral, of the State and shall not be enforceable 8against the State. The promissory note or line of credit shall 9be authorized by a resolution passed by the Board and shall be 10valid whether or not a budgeted item with respect to that 11resolution is included in any annual or supplemental budget 12adopted by the Board. The resolution shall set forth facts 13demonstrating the need for the borrowing, state an amount that 14the amount to be borrowed will not exceed, and establish a 15maximum interest rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate 16authorized by the Bond Authorization Act or 9%, whichever is 17less. The resolution may direct the Comptroller or Treasurer 18of the Board to make arrangements to set apart and hold the 19portion of the anticipated moneys, as received, that shall be 20used to repay the borrowing, subject to any prior pledges or 21restrictions with respect to the anticipated moneys. The 22resolution may also authorize the Treasurer of the Board to 23make partial repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated 24moneys become available and may contain any other terms, 25restrictions, or limitations not inconsistent with the powers 26of the Board.  SB1377- 94 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    For the purposes of this item (13), "financial 2institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois Banking 3Act, any savings and loan association subject to the Illinois 4Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any federally chartered 5commercial bank or savings and loan association or 6government-sponsored enterprise organized and operated in this 7State pursuant to the laws of the United States.8    (14) To assist in the provision of lands, buildings, and 9facilities that are supportive of University purposes and 10suitable and appropriate for the conduct and operation of the 11University's education programs, the Board may exercise the 12following powers with regard to that part of the Southeast 13Quarter of Section 11, Township 17 North, Range 1 West of the 144th Principal Meridian, the boundary which is described as 15follows:16    From the Northeast corner of Lot 33 of Homewood Terrace 17    Second Addition to the City of Moline in Rock Island 18    County, Illinois, said corner being the point of beginning 19    and being 1272.48 feet South and 526.23 feet East of the 20    center of Section 11; proceed thence South 00 deg.-00'-00" 21    West 179.04 feet along the East line of said Homewood 22    Terrace Second Addition; thence South 34 deg.-30'-00" West 23    l35.00 feet along the East line of said Homewood Terrace 24    Second Addition; thence South 34 deg.-22'-33" East 353.34 25    feet to the East line of the First Section of Homewood 5th 26    Addition to the City of Moline in Rock Island County,   SB1377- 95 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    Illinois; thence South 21 deg.-14'-01" East 448.00 feet 2    along the East line of said First Section of Homewood 5th 3    Addition to the North Right-of-Way line of Coaltown Road, 4    Moline; thence North 69 deg.-30'-59" East 13.39 feet along 5    the North Right-of-Way of Coaltown Road; thence 6    Northeasterly 302.69 feet along the North Right-of-Way of 7    Coaltown Road around a circular curve to the Right, said 8    curve having an initial tangent bearing of North 69 9    deg.-30'-59" East and a radius of 1950.08 feet; thence 10    North 49 deg.-29'-56" East 99.18 feet along the North 11    Right-of-Way line of Coaltown Road, Moline, to the West 12    Right-of-Way line of 60th Street, Moline; thence North 09 13    deg.-29'-20" West 366.24 feet along the West Right-of-Way 14    line of 60th Street, Moline Right-of-Way monument; thence 15    North 10 deg.-10'-03" West 263.50 feet along the West 16    Right-of-Way line of 60th Street, Moline Right-of-Way 17    monument; thence North 01 deg.-45'-57" West 81.37 feet 18    along the West line of 60th Street, Moline; thence 19    Northwesterly 581.39 feet around a circular curve to the 20    right, said curve having an initial tangent bearing of 21    South 89 deg.-27'-55" West and a radius of 1085.00 feet to 22    the point of beginning; Situated in Rock Island County, 23    Illinois. 24        (A) The Board may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer 25    and convey all or part of the real estate described in this 26    item (14), together with the improvements situated   SB1377- 96 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    thereon, to a bona fide purchaser for value, without 2    compliance with the State Property Control Act and on such 3    terms as the Board shall determine are in the best 4    interests of the University and consistent with its 5    objects and purposes. 6        (B) The Board may retain the proceeds from the sale, 7    lease, or other transfer of all or any part of the real 8    estate described in this item (14) in the University 9    treasury, in a special, separate development fund account 10    that the Auditor General shall examine to ensure the use 11    or deposit of those proceeds in a manner consistent with 12    subdivision (C) of this item (14). 13        (C) Revenues from the development fund account may be 14    withdrawn by the University for the purpose of demolition 15    and the processes associated with demolition; routine land 16    and property acquisition; streetscape work; landscape 17    work; lease and lease purchase arrangements and the 18    professional services associated with planning and 19    development; surface and structure parking; sidewalks, 20    recreational paths, and street construction; utility 21    infrastructure; historic preservation; and building 22    rehabilitation. Money from the development fund account 23    used for any other purpose must be deposited into and 24    appropriated from the General Revenue Fund. Buildings or 25    facilities leased to an entity or person other than the 26    University are not subject to any limitations applicable   SB1377- 97 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1    to a State-supported college or university under any law. 2    All development on the land and all use of any buildings or 3    facilities is subject to the control and approval of the 4    Board. 5(Source: P.A. 97-333, eff. 8-12-11; 98-998, eff. 8-18-14.) 6    Section 50. The Public Community College Act is amended by 7changing Section 3-42.1 as follows: 8    (110 ILCS 805/3-42.1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 103-42.1)9    Sec. 3-42.1. (a) To appoint law enforcement officer and 10non-law enforcement officer members of the community college 11district police department or department of public safety.12    (b) Members of the community college district police 13department or department of public safety who are law 14enforcement officers, as defined in the Illinois Police 15Training Act, shall be peace officers under the laws of this 16State. As such, law enforcement officer members of these 17departments shall have all of the powers of police officers in 18cities and sheriffs in counties, including the power to make 19arrests on view or on warrants for violations of State 20statutes and to enforce county or city ordinances in all 21counties that lie within the community college district, when 22such is required for the protection of community college 23personnel, students, property, or interests. Such officers 24shall have no power to serve and execute civil process. The   SB1377- 98 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1chief of police of a community college district police 2department or department of public safety has the final 3decision on all law enforcement decisions. The president, 4chancellors, or chief executive officer of a community college 5district are prohibited from being involved in law enforcement 6decisions. 7    As peace officers in this State, all laws pertaining to 8hiring, training, retention, service authority, and discipline 9of police officers, under State law, shall apply. Law 10enforcement officer members must complete the minimum basic 11training requirements of a police training school under the 12Illinois Police Training Act. Law enforcement officer members 13who have successfully completed an Illinois Law Enforcement 14Training Standards Board certified firearms course shall be 15equipped with appropriate firearms and auxiliary weapons.16    (c) Non-law enforcement officer members of the community 17college police, public safety, or security departments whose 18job requirements include performing patrol and security type 19functions shall, within 6 months after their initial hiring 20date, be required to successfully complete the 20-hour basic 21security training course required by (i) the Department of 22Financial and Professional Regulation, Division of 23Professional Regulation for Security Officers, (ii) by the 24International Association of College Law Enforcement 25Administrators, or (iii) campus protection officer training 26program or a similar course certified and approved by the   SB1377- 99 -LRB104 08987 LNS 19043 b1Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board. They shall 2also be permitted to become members of an Illinois State 3Training Board Mobile Training Unit and shall complete 8 hours 4in continuing training, related to their specific position of 5employment, each year. The board may establish reasonable 6eligibility requirements for appointment and retention of 7non-law enforcement officer members.8    All non-law enforcement officer members authorized to 9carry weapons, other than firearms, shall receive training on 10the proper deployment and use of force regarding such weapons. 11(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.